ro-RO: Mărime SUA pentru încălțăminte de bărbați: 1; 1 Extra lat; 1 Mediu; 1 Îngust; 1 Standard; 1 Lat; 1,5; 1,5 Extra lat; 1,5 Mediu; 1,5 Îngust; 1,5 Standard; 1,5 Lat; 10; 10 Extra lat; 10 Mediu; 10 Îngust; 10 Standard; 10 Lat; 10,5; 10,5 Extra lat; 10,5 Mediu; 10,5 Îngust; 10,5 Standard; 10,5 Lat; 11; 11 Extra lat; 11 Mediu; 11 Îngust; 11 Standard; 11 Lat; 11,5; 11,5 Extra lat; 11,5 Mediu; 11,5 Îngust; 11,5 Standard; 11,5 Lat; 12; 12 Extra lat; 12 Mediu; 12 Îngust; 12 Standard; 12 Lat; 12,5; 12,5 Extra lat; 12,5 Mediu; 12,5 Îngust; 12,5 Standard; 12,5 Lat; 13; 13 Extra lat; 13 Mediu; 13 Îngust; 13 Standard; 13 Lat; 13,5; 13,5 Extra lat; 13,5 Mediu; 13,5 Îngust; 13,5 Standard; 13,5 Lat; 14; 14 Extra lat; 14 Mediu; 14 Îngust; 14 Standard; 14 Lat; 14,5; 14,5 Extra lat; 14,5 Mediu; 14,5 Îngust; 14,5 Standard; 14,5 Lat; 15; 15 Extra lat; 15 Mediu; 15 Îngust; 15 Standard; 15 Lat; 15,5; 15,5 Extra lat; 15,5 Mediu; 15,5 Îngust; 15,5 Standard; 15,5 Lat; 16; 16 Extra lat; 16 Mediu; 16 Îngust; 16 Standard; 16 Lat; 16,5; 16,5 Extra lat; 16,5 Mediu; 16,5 Îngust; 16,5 Standard; 16,5 Lat; 17; 17 Extra lat; 17 Mediu; 17 Îngust; 17 Standard; 17 Lat; 17,5; 17,5 Extra lat; 17,5 Mediu; 17,5 Îngust; 17,5 Standard; 17,5 Lat; 18; 18 Extra lat; 18 Mediu; 18 Îngust; 18 Standard; 18 Lat; 2; 2 Extra lat; 2 Mediu; 2 Îngust; 2 Standard; 2 Lat; 2,5; 2,5 Extra lat; 2,5 Mediu; 2,5 Îngust; 2,5 Standard; 2,5 Lat; 3; 3 Extra lat; 3 Mediu; 3 Îngust; 3 Standard; 3 Lat; 3,5; 3,5 Extra lat; 3,5 Mediu; 3,5 Îngust; 3,5 Standard; 3,5 Lat; 4; 4 Extra lat; 4 Mediu; 4 Îngust; 4 Standard; 4 Lat; 4,5; 4,5 Extra lat; 4,5 Mediu; 4,5 Îngust; 4,5 Standard; 4,5 Lat; 5; 5 Extra lat; 5 Mediu; 5 Îngust; 5 Standard; 5 Lat; 5,5; 5,5 Extra lat; 5,5 Mediu; 5,5 Îngust; 5,5 Standard; 5,5 Lat; 6; 6 Extra lat; 6 Mediu; 6 Îngust; 6 Standard; 6 Lat; 6,5; 6,5 Extra lat; 6,5 Mediu; 6,5 Îngust; 6,5 Standard; 6,5 Lat; 7; 7 Extra lat; 7 Mediu; 7 Îngust; 7 Standard; 7 Lat; 7,5; 7,5 Extra lat; 7,5 Mediu; 7,5 Îngust; 7,5 Standard; 7,5 Lat; 8; 8 Extra lat; 8 Mediu; 8 Îngust; 8 Standard; 8 Lat; 8,5; 8,5 Extra lat; 8,5 Mediu; 8,5 Îngust; 8,5 Standard; 8,5 Lat; 9; 9 Extra lat; 9 Mediu; 9 Îngust; 9 Standard; 9 Lat; 9,5; 9,5 Extra lat; 9,5 Mediu; 9,5 Îngust; 9,5 Standard; 9,5 Lat; Altele
zh-TW: 美國男鞋尺寸: 1; 1 特寬; 1 中等; 1 窄; 1 標準; 1 寬; 1.5; 1.5 特寬; 1.5 中等; 1.5 窄; 1.5 標準; 1.5 寬; 10; 10 特寬; 10 中等; 10 窄; 10 標準; 10 寬; 10.5; 10.5 特寬; 10.5 中等; 10.5 窄; 10.5 標準; 10.5 寬; 11; 11 特寬; 11 中等; 11 窄; 11 標準; 11 寬; 11.5; 11.5 特寬; 11.5 中等; 11.5 窄; 11.5 標準; 11.5 寬; 12; 12 特寬; 12 中等; 12 窄; 12 標準; 12 寬; 12.5; 12.5 特寬; 12.5 中等; 12.5 窄; 12.5 標準; 12.5 寬; 13; 13 特寬; 13 中等; 13 窄; 13 標準; 13 寬; 13.5; 13.5 特寬; 13.5 中等; 13.5 窄; 13.5 標準; 13.5 寬; 14; 14 特寬; 14 中等; 14 窄; 14 標準; 14 寬; 14.5; 14.5 特寬; 14.5 中等; 14.5 窄; 14.5 標準; 14.5 寬; 15; 15 特寬; 15 中等; 15 窄; 15 標準; 15 寬; 15.5; 15.5 特寬; 15.5 中等; 15.5 窄; 15.5 標準; 15.5 寬; 16; 16 特寬; 16 中等; 16 窄; 16 標準; 16 寬; 16.5; 16.5 特寬; 16.5 中等; 16.5 窄; 16.5 標準; 16.5 寬; 17; 17 特寬; 17 中等; 17 窄; 17 標準; 17 寬; 17.5; 17.5 特寬; 17.5 中等; 17.5 窄; 17.5 標準; 17.5 寬; 18; 18 特寬; 18 中等; 18 窄; 18 標準; 18 寬; 2; 2 特寬; 2 中等; 2 窄; 2 標準; 2 寬; 2.5; 2.5 特寬; 2.5 中等; 2.5 窄; 2.5 標準; 2.5 寬; 3; 3 特寬; 3 中等; 3 窄; 3 標準; 3 寬; 3.5; 3.5 特寬; 3.5 中等; 3.5 窄; 3.5 標準; 3.5 寬; 4; 4 特寬; 4 中等; 4 窄; 4 標準; 4 寬; 4.5; 4.5 特寬; 4.5 中等; 4.5 窄; 4.5 標準; 4.5 寬; 5; 5 特寬; 5 中等; 5 窄; 5 標準; 5 寬; 5.5; 5.5 特寬; 5.5 中等; 5.5 窄; 5.5 標準; 5.5 寬; 6; 6 特寬; 6 中等; 6 窄; 6 標準; 6 寬; 6.5; 6.5 特寬; 6.5 中等; 6.5 窄; 6.5 標準; 6.5 寬; 7; 7 特寬; 7 中等; 7 窄; 7 標準; 7 寬; 7.5; 7.5 特寬; 7.5 中等; 7.5 窄; 7.5 標準; 7.5 寬; 8; 8 特寬; 8 中等; 8 窄; 8 標準; 8 寬; 8.5; 8.5 特寬; 8.5 中等; 8.5 窄; 8.5 標準; 8.5 寬; 9; 9 特寬; 9 中等; 9 窄; 9 標準; 9 寬; 9.5; 9.5 特寬; 9.5 中等; 9.5 窄; 9.5 標準; 9.5 寬; 其他
sv: Skostorlekar män USA: 1; 1 extra bred; 1 medium; 1 smal; 1 standard; 1 bred; 1,5; 1,5 extra bred; 1,5 medium; 1,5 smal; 1,5 standard; 1,5 bred; 10; 10 extra bred; 10 medium; 10 smal; 10 standard; 10 bred; 10,5; 10,5 extra bred; 10,5 medium; 10,5 smal; 10,5 standard; 10,5 bred; 11; 11 extra bred; 11 medium; 11 smal; 11 standard; 11 bred; 11,5; 11,5 extra bred; 11,5 medium; 11,5 smal; 11,5 standard; 11,5 bred; 12; 12 extra bred; 12 medium; 12 smal; 12 standard; 12 bred; 12,5; 12,5 extra bred; 12,5 medium; 12,5 smal; 12,5 standard; 12,5 bred; 13; 13 extra bred; 13 medium; 13 smal; 13 standard; 13 bred; 13,5; 13,5 extra bred; 13,5 medium; 13,5 smal; 13,5 standard; 13,5 bred; 14; 14 extra bred; 14 medium; 14 smal; 14 standard; 14 bred; 14,5; 14,5 extra bred; 14,5 medium; 14,5 smal; 14,5 standard; 14,5 bred; 15; 15 extra bred; 15 medium; 15 smal; 15 standard; 15 bred; 15,5; 15,5 extra bred; 15,5 medium; 15,5 smal; 15,5 standard; 15,5 bred; 16; 16 extra bred; 16 medium; 16 smal; 16 standard; 16 bred; 16,5; 16,5 extra bred; 16,5 medium; 16,5 smal; 16,5 standard; 16,5 bred; 17; 17 extra bred; 17 medium; 17 smal; 17 standard; 17 bred; 17,5; 17,5 extra bred; 17,5 medium; 17,5 smal; 17,5 standard; 17,5 bred; 18; 18 extra bred; 18 medium; 18 smal; 18 standard; 18 bred; 2; 2 extra bred; 2 medium; 2 smal; 2 standard; 2 bred; 2,5; 2,5 extra bred; 2,5 medium; 2,5 smal; 2,5 standard; 2,5 bred; 3; 3 extra bred; 3 medium; 3 smal; 3 standard; 3 bred; 3,5; 3,5 extra bred; 3,5 medium; 3,5 smal; 3,5 standard; 3,5 bred; 4; 4 extra bred; 4 medium; 4 smal; 4 standard; 4 bred; 4,5; 4,5 extra bred; 4,5 medium; 4,5 smal; 4,5 standard; 4,5 bred; 5; 5 extra bred; 5 medium; 5 smal; 5 standard; 5 bred; 5,5; 5,5 extra bred; 5,5 medium; 5,5 smal; 5,5 standard; 5,5 bred; 6; 6 extra bred; 6 medium; 6 smal; 6 standard; 6 bred; 6,5; 6,5 extra bred; 6,5 medium; 6,5 smal; 6,5 standard; 6,5 bred; 7; 7 extra bred; 7 medium; 7 smal; 7 standard; 7 bred; 7,5; 7,5 extra bred; 7,5 medium; 7,5 smal; 7,5 standard; 7,5 bred; 8; 8 extra bred; 8 medium; 8 smal; 8 standard; 8 bred; 8,5; 8,5 extra bred; 8,5 medium; 8,5 smal; 8,5 standard; 8,5 bred; 9; 9 extra bred; 9 medium; 9 smal; 9 standard; 9 bred; 9,5; 9,5 extra bred; 9,5 medium; 9,5 smal; 9,5 standard; 9,5 bred; Övrigt
cs: Americká velikost pánské obuvi: 1; 1 extra široké; 1 střední; 1 úzké; 1 standardní; 1 široké; 1,5; 1,5 extra široké; 1,5 střední; 1,5 úzké; 1,5 standardní; 1,5 široké; 10; 10 extra široké; 10 střední; 10 úzké; 10 standardní; 10 široké; 10,5; 10,5 extra široké; 10,5 střední; 10,5 úzké; 10,5 standardní; 10,5 široké; 11; 11 extra široké; 11 střední; 11 úzké; 11 standardní; 11 široké; 11,5; 11,5 extra široké; 11,5 střední; 11,5 úzké; 11,5 standardní; 11,5 široké; 12; 12 extra široké; 12 střední; 12 úzké; 12 standardní; 12 široké; 12,5; 12,5 extra široké; 12,5 střední; 12,5 úzké; 12,5 standardní; 12,5 široké; 13; 13 extra široké; 13 střední; 13 úzké; 13 standardní; 13 široké; 13,5; 13,5 extra široké; 13,5 střední; 13,5 úzké; 13,5 standardní; 13,5 široké; 14; 14 extra široké; 14 střední; 14 úzké; 14 standardní; 14 široké; 14,5; 14,5 extra široké; 14,5 střední; 14,5 úzké; 14,5 standardní; 14,5 široké; 15; 15 extra široké; 15 střední; 15 úzké; 15 standardní; 15 široké; 15,5; 15,5 extra široké; 15,5 střední; 15,5 úzké; 15,5 standardní; 15,5 široké; 16; 16 extra široké; 16 střední; 16 úzké; 16 standardní; 16 široké; 16,5; 16,5 extra široké; 16,5 střední; 16,5 úzké; 16,5 standardní; 16,5 široké; 17; 17 extra široké; 17 střední; 17 úzké; 17 standardní; 17 široké; 17,5; 17,5 extra široké; 17,5 střední; 17,5 úzké; 17,5 standardní; 17,5 široké; 18; 18 extra široké; 18 střední; 18 úzké; 18 standardní; 18 široké; 2; 2 extra široké; 2 střední; 2 úzké; 2 standardní; 2 široké; 2,5; 2,5 extra široké; 2,5 střední; 2,5 úzké; 2,5 standardní; 2,5 široké; 3; 3 extra široké; 3 střední; 3 úzké; 3 standardní; 3 široké; 3,5; 3,5 extra široké; 3,5 střední; 3,5 úzké; 3,5 standardní; 3,5 široké; 4; 4 extra široké; 4 střední; 4 úzké; 4 standardní; 4 široké; 4,5; 4,5 extra široké; 4,5 střední; 4,5 úzké; 4,5 standardní; 4,5 široké; 5; 5 extra široké; 5 střední; 5 úzké; 5 standardní; 5 široké; 5,5; 5,5 extra široké; 5,5 střední; 5,5 úzké; 5,5 standardní; 5,5 široké; 6; 6 extra široké; 6 střední; 6 úzké; 6 standardní; 6 široké; 6,5; 6,5 extra široké; 6,5 střední; 6,5 úzké; 6,5 standardní; 6,5 široké; 7; 7 extra široké; 7 střední; 7 úzké; 7 standardní; 7 široké; 7,5; 7,5 extra široké; 7,5 střední; 7,5 úzké; 7,5 standardní; 7,5 široké; 8; 8 extra široké; 8 střední; 8 úzké; 8 standardní; 8 široké; 8,5; 8,5 extra široké; 8,5 střední; 8,5 úzké; 8,5 standardní; 8,5 široké; 9; 9 extra široké; 9 střední; 9 úzké; 9 standardní; 9 široké; 9,5; 9,5 extra široké; 9,5 střední; 9,5 úzké; 9,5 standardní; 9,5 široké; Jiné
da: Britisk skostørrelse for kvinder: 1; 1 ekstra bred; 1 medium; 1 smal; 1 standard; 1 bred; 1,5; 1,5 ekstra bred; 1,5 medium; 1,5 smal; 1,5 standard; 1,5 bred; 10; 10 ekstra bred; 10 medium; 10 smal; 10 standard; 10 bred; 10,5; 10,5 ekstra bred; 10,5 medium; 10,5 smal; 10,5 standard; 10,5 bred; 11; 11 ekstra bred; 11 medium; 11 smal; 11 standard; 11 bred; 11,5; 11,5 ekstra bred; 11,5 medium; 11,5 smal; 11,5 standard; 11,5 bred; 12; 12 ekstra bred; 12 medium; 12 smal; 12 standard; 12 bred; 12,5; 12,5 ekstra bred; 12,5 medium; 12,5 smal; 12,5 standard; 12,5 bred; 13; 13 ekstra bred; 13 medium; 13 smal; 13 standard; 13 bred; 13,5; 13,5 ekstra bred; 13,5 medium; 13,5 smal; 13,5 standard; 13,5 bred; 14; 14 ekstra bred; 14 medium; 14 smal; 14 standard; 14 bred; 14,5; 14,5 ekstra bred; 14,5 medium; 14,5 smal; 14,5 standard; 14,5 bred; 15; 15 ekstra bred; 15 medium; 15 smal; 15 standard; 15 bred; 15,5; 15,5 ekstra bred; 15,5 medium; 15,5 smal; 15,5 standard; 15,5 bred; 16; 16 ekstra bred; 16 medium; 16 smal; 16 standard; 16 bred; 16,5; 16,5 ekstra bred; 16,5 medium; 16,5 smal; 16,5 standard; 16,5 bred; 17; 17 ekstra bred; 17 medium; 17 smal; 17 standard; 17 bred; 17,5; 17,5 ekstra bred; 17,5 medium; 17,5 smal; 17,5 standard; 17,5 bred; 18; 18 ekstra bred; 18 medium; 18 smal; 18 standard; 18 bred; 2; 2 ekstra bred; 2 medium; 2 smal; 2 standard; 2 bred; 2,5; 2,5 ekstra bred; 2,5 medium; 2,5 smal; 2,5 standard; 2,5 bred; 3; 3 ekstra bred; 3 medium; 3 smal; 3 standard; 3 bred; 3,5; 3,5 ekstra bred; 3,5 medium; 3,5 smal; 3,5 standard; 3,5 bred; 4; 4 ekstra bred; 4 medium; 4 smal; 4 standard; 4 bred; 4,5; 4,5 ekstra bred; 4,5 medium; 4,5 smal; 4,5 standard; 4,5 bred; 5; 5 ekstra bred; 5 medium; 5 smal; 5 standard; 5 bred; 5,5; 5,5 ekstra bred; 5,5 medium; 5,5 smal; 5,5 standard; 5,5 bred; 6; 6 ekstra bred; 6 medium; 6 smal; 6 standard; 6 bred; 6,5; 6,5 ekstra bred; 6,5 medium; 6,5 smal; 6,5 standard; 6,5 bred; 7; 7 ekstra bred; 7 medium; 7 smal; 7 standard; 7 bred; 7,5; 7,5 ekstra bred; 7,5 medium; 7,5 smal; 7,5 standard; 7,5 bred; 8; 8 ekstra bred; 8 medium; 8 smal; 8 standard; 8 bred; 8,5; 8,5 ekstra bred; 8,5 medium; 8,5 smal; 8,5 standard; 8,5 bred; 9; 9 ekstra bred; 9 medium; 9 smal; 9 standard; 9 bred; 9,5; 9,5 ekstra bred; 9,5 medium; 9,5 smal; 9,5 standard; 9,5 bred; Andet
th: ขนาดรองเท้าผู้ชายแบบสหรัฐอเมริกา: 1; 1 กว้างพิเศษ; 1 ปานกลาง; 1 แคบ; 1 มาตรฐาน; 1 กว้าง; 1.5; 1.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 1.5 ปานกลาง; 1.5 แคบ; 1.5 มาตรฐาน; 1.5 กว้าง; 10; 10 กว้างพิเศษ; 10 ปานกลาง; 10 แคบ; 10 มาตรฐาน; 10 กว้าง; 10.5; 10.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 10.5 ปานกลาง; 10.5 แคบ; 10.5 มาตรฐาน; 10.5 กว้าง; 11; 11 กว้างพิเศษ; 11 ปานกลาง; 11 แคบ; 11 มาตรฐาน; 11 กว้าง; 11.5; 11.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 11.5 ปานกลาง; 11.5 แคบ; 11.5 มาตรฐาน; 11.5 กว้าง; 12; 12 กว้างพิเศษ; 12 ปานกลาง; 12 แคบ; 12 มาตรฐาน; 12 กว้าง; 12.5; 12.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 12.5 ปานกลาง; 12.5 แคบ; 12.5 มาตรฐาน; 12.5 กว้าง; 13; 13 กว้างพิเศษ; 13 ปานกลาง; 13 แคบ; 13 มาตรฐาน; 13 กว้าง; 13.5; 13.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 13.5 ปานกลาง; 13.5 แคบ; 13.5 มาตรฐาน; 13.5 กว้าง; 14; 14 กว้างพิเศษ; 14 ปานกลาง; 14 แคบ; 14 มาตรฐาน; 14 กว้าง; 14.5; 14.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 14.5 ปานกลาง; 14.5 แคบ; 14.5 มาตรฐาน; 14.5 กว้าง; 15; 15 กว้างพิเศษ; 15 ปานกลาง; 15 แคบ; 15 มาตรฐาน; 15 กว้าง; 15.5; 15.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 15.5 ปานกลาง; 15.5 แคบ; 15.5 มาตรฐาน; 15.5 กว้าง; 16; 16 กว้างพิเศษ; 16 ปานกลาง; 16 แคบ; 16 มาตรฐาน; 16 กว้าง; 16.5; 16.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 16.5 ปานกลาง; 16.5 แคบ; 16.5 มาตรฐาน; 16.5 กว้าง; 17; 17 กว้างพิเศษ; 17 ปานกลาง; 17 แคบ; 17 มาตรฐาน; 17 กว้าง; 17.5; 17.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 17.5 ปานกลาง; 17.5 แคบ; 17.5 มาตรฐาน; 17.5 กว้าง; 18; 18 กว้างพิเศษ; 18 ปานกลาง; 18 แคบ; 18 มาตรฐาน; 18 กว้าง; 2; 2 กว้างพิเศษ; 2 ปานกลาง; 2 แคบ; 2 มาตรฐาน; 2 กว้าง; 2.5; 2.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 2.5 ปานกลาง; 2.5 แคบ; 2.5 มาตรฐาน; 2.5 กว้าง; 3; 3 กว้างพิเศษ; 3 ปานกลาง; 3 แคบ; 3 มาตรฐาน; 3 กว้าง; 3.5; 3.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 3.5 ปานกลาง; 3.5 แคบ; 3.5 มาตรฐาน; 3.5 กว้าง; 4; 4 กว้างพิเศษ; 4 ปานกลาง; 4 แคบ; 4 มาตรฐาน; 4 กว้าง; 4.5; 4.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 4.5 ปานกลาง; 4.5 แคบ; 4.5 มาตรฐาน; 4.5 กว้าง; 5; 5 กว้างพิเศษ; 5 ปานกลาง; 5 แคบ; 5 มาตรฐาน; 5 กว้าง; 5.5; 5.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 5.5 ปานกลาง; 5.5 แคบ; 5.5 มาตรฐาน; 5.5 กว้าง; 6; 6 กว้างพิเศษ; 6 ปานกลาง; 6 แคบ; 6 มาตรฐาน; 6 กว้าง; 6.5; 6.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 6.5 ปานกลาง; 6.5 แคบ; 6.5 มาตรฐาน; 6.5 กว้าง; 7; 7 กว้างพิเศษ; 7 ปานกลาง; 7 แคบ; 7 มาตรฐาน; 7 กว้าง; 7.5; 7.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 7.5 ปานกลาง; 7.5 แคบ; 7.5 มาตรฐาน; 7.5 กว้าง; 8; 8 กว้างพิเศษ; 8 ปานกลาง; 8 แคบ; 8 มาตรฐาน; 8 กว้าง; 8.5; 8.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 8.5 ปานกลาง; 8.5 แคบ; 8.5 มาตรฐาน; 8.5 กว้าง; 9; 9 กว้างพิเศษ; 9 ปานกลาง; 9 แคบ; 9 มาตรฐาน; 9 กว้าง; 9.5; 9.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 9.5 ปานกลาง; 9.5 แคบ; 9.5 มาตรฐาน; 9.5 กว้าง; อื่นๆ
ko: 미국 남성 신발 사이즈: 1; 1 매우 넓음; 1 보통; 1 좁음; 1 표준; 1 넓음; 1.5; 1.5 매우 넓음; 1.5 보통; 1.5 좁음; 1.5 표준; 1.5 넓음; 10; 10 매우 넓음; 10 보통; 10 좁음; 10 표준; 10 넓음; 10.5; 10.5 매우 넓음; 10.5 보통; 10.5 좁음; 10.5 표준; 10.5 넓음; 11; 11 매우 넓음; 11 보통; 11 좁음; 11 표준; 11 넓음; 11.5; 11.5 매우 넓음; 11.5 보통; 11.5 좁음; 11.5 표준; 11.5 넓음; 12; 12 매우 넓음; 12 보통; 12 좁음; 12 표준; 12 넓음; 12.5; 12.5 매우 넓음; 12.5 보통; 12.5 좁음; 12.5 표준; 12.5 넓음; 13; 13 매우 넓음; 13 보통; 13 좁음; 13 표준; 13 넓음; 13.5; 13.5 매우 넓음; 13.5 보통; 13.5 좁음; 13.5 표준; 13.5 넓음; 14; 14 매우 넓음; 14 보통; 14 좁음; 14 표준; 14 넓음; 14.5; 14.5 매우 넓음; 14.5 보통; 14.5 좁음; 14.5 표준; 14.5 넓음; 15; 15 매우 넓음; 15 보통; 15 좁음; 15 표준; 15 넓음; 15.5; 15.5 매우 넓음; 15.5 보통; 15.5 좁음; 15.5 표준; 15.5 넓음; 16; 16 매우 넓음; 16 보통; 16 좁음; 16 표준; 16 넓음; 16.5; 16.5 매우 넓음; 16.5 보통; 16.5 좁음; 16.5 표준; 16.5 넓음; 17; 17 매우 넓음; 17 보통; 17 좁음; 17 표준; 17 넓음; 17.5; 17.5 매우 넓음; 17.5 보통; 17.5 좁음; 17.5 표준; 17.5 넓음; 18; 18 매우 넓음; 18 보통; 18 좁음; 18 표준; 18 넓음; 2; 2 매우 넓음; 2 보통; 2 좁음; 2 표준; 2 넓음; 2.5; 2.5 매우 넓음; 2.5 보통; 2.5 좁음; 2.5 표준; 2.5 넓음; 3; 3 매우 넓음; 3 보통; 3 좁음; 3 표준; 3 넓음; 3.5; 3.5 매우 넓음; 3.5 보통; 3.5 좁음; 3.5 표준; 3.5 넓음; 4; 4 매우 넓음; 4 보통; 4 좁음; 4 표준; 4 넓음; 4.5; 4.5 매우 넓음; 4.5 보통; 4.5 좁음; 4.5 표준; 4.5 넓음; 5; 5 매우 넓음; 5 보통; 5 좁음; 5 표준; 5 넓음; 5.5; 5.5 매우 넓음; 5.5 보통; 5.5 좁음; 5.5 표준; 5.5 넓음; 6; 6 매우 넓음; 6 보통; 6 좁음; 6 표준; 6 넓음; 6.5; 6.5 매우 넓음; 6.5 보통; 6.5 좁음; 6.5 표준; 6.5 넓음; 7; 7 매우 넓음; 7 보통; 7 좁음; 7 표준; 7 넓음; 7.5; 7.5 매우 넓음; 7.5 보통; 7.5 좁음; 7.5 표준; 7.5 넓음; 8; 8 매우 넓음; 8 보통; 8 좁음; 8 표준; 8 넓음; 8.5; 8.5 매우 넓음; 8.5 보통; 8.5 좁음; 8.5 표준; 8.5 넓음; 9; 9 매우 넓음; 9 보통; 9 좁음; 9 표준; 9 넓음; 9.5; 9.5 매우 넓음; 9.5 보통; 9.5 좁음; 9.5 표준; 9.5 넓음; 기타
zh-CN: 美国男士鞋码: 1; 1 特宽; 1 中等; 1 窄; 1 标准; 1 宽; 1.5; 1.5 特宽; 1.5 中等; 1.5 窄; 1.5 标准; 1.5 宽; 10; 10 特宽; 10 中等; 10 窄; 10 标准; 10 宽; 10.5; 10.5 特宽; 10.5 中等; 10.5 窄; 10.5 标准; 10.5 宽; 11; 11 特宽; 11 中等; 11 窄; 11 标准; 11 宽; 11.5; 11.5 特宽; 11.5 中等; 11.5 窄; 11.5 标准; 11.5 宽; 12; 12 特宽; 12 中等; 12 窄; 12 标准; 12 宽; 12.5; 12.5 特宽; 12.5 中等; 12.5 窄; 12.5 标准; 12.5 宽; 13; 13 特宽; 13 中等; 13 窄; 13 标准; 13 宽; 13.5; 13.5 特宽; 13.5 中等; 13.5 窄; 13.5 标准; 13.5 宽; 14; 14 特宽; 14 中等; 14 窄; 14 标准; 14 宽; 14.5; 14.5 特宽; 14.5 中等; 14.5 窄; 14.5 标准; 14.5 宽; 15; 15 特宽; 15 中等; 15 窄; 15 标准; 15 宽; 15.5; 15.5 特宽; 15.5 中等; 15.5 窄; 15.5 标准; 15.5 宽; 16; 16 特宽; 16 中等; 16 窄; 16 标准; 16 宽; 16.5; 16.5 特宽; 16.5 中等; 16.5 窄; 16.5 标准; 16.5 宽; 17; 17 特宽; 17 中等; 17 窄; 17 标准; 17 宽; 17.5; 17.5 特宽; 17.5 中等; 17.5 窄; 17.5 标准; 17.5 宽; 18; 18 特宽; 18 中等; 18 窄; 18 标准; 18 宽; 2; 2 特宽; 2 中等; 2 窄; 2 标准; 2 宽; 2.5; 2.5 特宽; 2.5 中等; 2.5 窄; 2.5 标准; 2.5 宽; 3; 3 特宽; 3 中等; 3 窄; 3 标准; 3 宽; 3.5; 3.5 特宽; 3.5 中等; 3.5 窄; 3.5 标准; 3.5 宽; 4; 4 特宽; 4 中等; 4 窄; 4 标准; 4 宽; 4.5; 4.5 特宽; 4.5 中等; 4.5 窄; 4.5 标准; 4.5 宽; 5; 5 特宽; 5 中等; 5 窄; 5 标准; 5 宽; 5.5; 5.5 特宽; 5.5 中等; 5.5 窄; 5.5 标准; 5.5 宽; 6; 6 特宽; 6 中等; 6 窄; 6 标准; 6 宽; 6.5; 6.5 特宽; 6.5 中等; 6.5 窄; 6.5 标准; 6.5 宽; 7; 7 特宽; 7 中等; 7 窄; 7 标准; 7 宽; 7.5; 7.5 特宽; 7.5 中等; 7.5 窄; 7.5 标准; 7.5 宽; 8; 8 特宽; 8 中等; 8 窄; 8 标准; 8 宽; 8.5; 8.5 特宽; 8.5 中等; 8.5 窄; 8.5 标准; 8.5 宽; 9; 9 特宽; 9 中等; 9 窄; 9 标准; 9 宽; 9.5; 9.5 特宽; 9.5 中等; 9.5 窄; 9.5 标准; 9.5 宽; 其他
ru: Размер мужской обуви US: 1; 1 очень широкий; 1 средний; 1 узкий; 1 стандартный; 1 широкий; 1,5; 1,5 очень широкий; 1,5 средний; 1,5 узкий; 1,5 стандартный; 1,5 широкий; 10; 10 очень широкий; 10 средний; 10 узкий; 10 стандартный; 10 широкий; 10,5; 10,5 очень широкий; 10,5 средний; 10,5 узкий; 10,5 стандартный; 10,5 широкий; 11; 11 очень широкий; 11 средний; 11 узкий; 11 стандартный; 11 широкий; 11,5; 11,5 очень широкий; 11,5 средний; 11,5 узкий; 11,5 стандартный; 11,5 широкий; 12; 12 очень широкий; 12 средний; 12 узкий; 12 стандартный; 12 широкий; 12,5; 12,5 очень широкий; 12,5 средний; 12,5 узкий; 12,5 стандартный; 12,5 широкий; 13; 13 очень широкий; 13 средний; 13 узкий; 13 стандартный; 13 широкий; 13,5; 13,5 очень широкий; 13,5 средний; 13,5 узкий; 13,5 стандартный; 13,5 широкий; 14; 14 очень широкий; 14 средний; 14 узкий; 14 стандартный; 14 широкий; 14,5; 14,5 очень широкий; 14,5 средний; 14,5 узкий; 14,5 стандартный; 14,5 широкий; 15; 15 очень широкий; 15 средний; 15 узкий; 15 стандартный; 15 широкий; 15,5; 15,5 очень широкий; 15,5 средний; 15,5 узкий; 15,5 стандартный; 15,5 широкий; 16; 16 очень широкий; 16 средний; 16 узкий; 16 стандартный; 16 широкий; 16,5; 16,5 очень широкий; 16,5 средний; 16,5 узкий; 16,5 стандартный; 16,5 широкий; 17; 17 очень широкий; 17 средний; 17 узкий; 17 стандартный; 17 широкий; 17,5; 17,5 очень широкий; 17,5 средний; 17,5 узкий; 17,5 стандартный; 17,5 широкий; 18; 18 очень широкий; 18 средний; 18 узкий; 18 стандартный; 18 широкий; 2; 2 очень широкий; 2 средний; 2 узкий; 2 стандартный; 2 широкий; 2,5; 2,5 очень широкий; 2,5 средний; 2,5 узкий; 2,5 стандартный; 2,5 широкий; 3; 3 очень широкий; 3 средний; 3 узкий; 3 стандартный; 3 широкий; 3,5; 3,5 очень широкий; 3,5 средний; 3,5 узкий; 3,5 стандартный; 3,5 широкий; 4; 4 очень широкий; 4 средний; 4 узкий; 4 стандартный; 4 широкий; 4,5; 4,5 очень широкий; 4,5 средний; 4,5 узкий; 4,5 стандартный; 4,5 широкий; 5; 5 очень широкий; 5 средний; 5 узкий; 5 стандартный; 5 широкий; 5,5; 5,5 очень широкий; 5,5 средний; 5,5 узкий; 5,5 стандартный; 5,5 широкий; 6; 6 очень широкий; 6 средний; 6 узкий; 6 стандартный; 6 широкий; 6,5; 6,5 очень широкий; 6,5 средний; 6,5 узкий; 6,5 стандартный; 6,5 широкий; 7; 7 очень широкий; 7 средний; 7 узкий; 7 стандартный; 7 широкий; 7,5; 7,5 очень широкий; 7,5 средний; 7,5 узкий; 7,5 стандартный; 7,5 широкий; 8; 8 очень широкий; 8 средний; 8 узкий; 8 стандартный; 8 широкий; 8,5; 8,5 очень широкий; 8,5 средний; 8,5 узкий; 8,5 стандартный; 8,5 широкий; 9; 9 очень широкий; 9 средний; 9 узкий; 9 стандартный; 9 широкий; 9,5; 9,5 очень широкий; 9,5 средний; 9,5 узкий; 9,5 стандартный; 9,5 широкий; Другой
sl-SI: Ameriška velikost moških čevljev: 1; 1 zelo široko; 1 srednje; 1 ozko; 1 standardno; 1 široko; 1,5; 1,5 zelo široko; 1,5 srednje; 1,5 ozko; 1,5 standardno; 1,5 široko; 10; 10 zelo široko; 10 srednje; 10 ozko; 10 standardno; 10 široko; 10,5; 10,5 zelo široko; 10,5 srednje; 10,5 ozko; 10,5 standardno; 10,5 široko; 11; 11 zelo široko; 11 srednje; 11 ozko; 11 standardno; 11 široko; 11,5; 11,5 zelo široko; 11,5 srednje; 11,5 ozko; 11,5 standardno; 11,5 široko; 12; 12 zelo široko; 12 srednje; 12 ozko; 12 standardno; 12 široko; 12,5; 12,5 zelo široko; 12,5 srednje; 12,5 ozko; 12,5 standardno; 12,5 široko; 13; 13 zelo široko; 13 srednje; 13 ozko; 13 standardno; 13 široko; 13,5; 13,5 zelo široko; 13,5 srednje; 13,5 ozko; 13,5 standardno; 13,5 široko; 14; 14 zelo široko; 14 srednje; 14 ozko; 14 standardno; 14 široko; 14,5; 14,5 zelo široko; 14,5 srednje; 14,5 ozko; 14,5 standardno; 14,5 široko; 15; 15 zelo široko; 15 srednje; 15 ozko; 15 standardno; 15 široko; 15,5; 15,5 zelo široko; 15,5 srednje; 15,5 ozko; 15,5 standardno; 15,5 široko; 16; 16 zelo široko; 16 srednje; 16 ozko; 16 standardno; 16 široko; 16,5; 16,5 zelo široko; 16,5 srednje; 16,5 ozko; 16,5 standardno; 16,5 široko; 17; 17 zelo široko; 17 srednje; 17 ozko; 17 standardno; 17 široko; 17,5; 17,5 zelo široko; 17,5 srednje; 17,5 ozko; 17,5 standardno; 17,5 široko; 18; 18 zelo široko; 18 srednje; 18 ozko; 18 standardno; 18 široko; 2; 2 zelo široko; 2 srednje; 2 ozko; 2 standardno; 2 široko; 2,5; 2,5 zelo široko; 2,5 srednje; 2,5 ozko; 2,5 standardno; 2,5 široko; 3; 3 zelo široko; 3 srednje; 3 ozko; 3 standardno; 3 široko; 3,5; 3,5 zelo široko; 3,5 srednje; 3,5 ozko; 3,5 standardno; 3,5 široko; 4; 4 zelo široko; 4 srednje; 4 ozko; 4 standardno; 4 široko; 4,5; 4,5 zelo široko; 4,5 srednje; 4,5 ozko; 4,5 standardno; 4,5 široko; 5; 5 zelo široko; 5 srednje; 5 ozko; 5 standardno; 5 široko; 5,5; 5,5 zelo široko; 5,5 srednje; 5,5 ozko; 5,5 standardno; 5,5 široko; 6; 6 zelo široko; 6 srednje; 6 ozko; 6 standardno; 6 široko; 6,5; 6,5 zelo široko; 6,5 srednje; 6,5 ozko; 6,5 standardno; 6,5 široko; 7; 7 zelo široko; 7 srednje; 7 ozko; 7 standardno; 7 široko; 7,5; 7,5 zelo široko; 7,5 srednje; 7,5 ozko; 7,5 standardno; 7,5 široko; 8; 8 zelo široko; 8 srednje; 8 ozko; 8 standardno; 8 široko; 8,5; 8,5 zelo široko; 8,5 srednje; 8,5 ozko; 8,5 standardno; 8,5 široko; 9; 9 zelo široko; 9 srednje; 9 ozko; 9 standardno; 9 široko; 9,5; 9,5 zelo široko; 9,5 srednje; 9,5 ozko; 9,5 standardno; 9,5 široko; Drugo
bg-BG: US размер на мъжки обувки: 1; 1 Много широк; 1 Среден; 1 Тесен; 1 Стандартен; 1 Широк; 1,5; 1,5 Много широк; 1,5 Среден; 1,5 Тесен; 1,5 Стандартен; 1,5 Широк; 10; 10 Много широк; 10 Среден; 10 Тесен; 10 Стандартен; 10 Широк; 10,5; 10,5 Много широк; 10,5 Среден; 10,5 Тесен; 10,5 Стандартен; 10,5 Широк; 11; 11 Много широк; 11 Среден; 11 Тесен; 11 Стандартен; 11 Широк; 11,5; 11,5 Много широк; 11,5 Среден; 11,5 Тесен; 11,5 Стандартен; 11,5 Широк; 12; 12 Много широк; 12 Среден; 12 Тесен; 12 Стандартен; 12 Широк; 12,5; 12,5 Много широк; 12,5 Среден; 12,5 Тесен; 12,5 Стандартен; 12,5 Широк; 13; 13 Много широк; 13 Среден; 13 Тесен; 13 Стандартен; 13 Широк; 13,5; 13,5 Много широк; 13,5 Среден; 13,5 Тесен; 13,5 Стандартен; 13,5 Широк; 14; 14 Много широк; 14 Среден; 14 Тесен; 14 Стандартен; 14 Широк; 14,5; 14,5 Много широк; 14,5 Среден; 14,5 Тесен; 14,5 Стандартен; 14,5 Широк; 15; 15 Много широк; 15 Среден; 15 Тесен; 15 Стандартен; 15 Широк; 15,5; 15,5 Много широк; 15,5 Среден; 15,5 Тесен; 15,5 Стандартен; 15,5 Широк; 16; 16 Много широк; 16 Среден; 16 Тесен; 16 Стандартен; 16 Широк; 16,5; 16,5 Много широк; 16,5 Среден; 16,5 Тесен; 16,5 Стандартен; 16,5 Широк; 17; 17 Много широк; 17 Среден; 17 Тесен; 17 Стандартен; 17 Широк; 17,5; 17,5 Много широк; 17,5 Среден; 17,5 Тесен; 17,5 Стандартен; 17,5 Широк; 18; 18 Много широк; 18 Среден; 18 Тесен; 18 Стандартен; 18 Широк; 2; 2 Много широк; 2 Среден; 2 Тесен; 2 Стандартен; 2 Широк; 2,5; 2,5 Много широк; 2,5 Среден; 2,5 Тесен; 2,5 Стандартен; 2,5 Широк; 3; 3 Много широк; 3 Среден; 3 Тесен; 3 Стандартен; 3 Широк; 3,5; 3,5 Много широк; 3,5 Среден; 3,5 Тесен; 3,5 Стандартен; 3,5 Широк; 4; 4 Много широк; 4 Среден; 4 Тесен; 4 Стандартен; 4 Широк; 4,5; 4,5 Много широк; 4,5 Среден; 4,5 Тесен; 4,5 Стандартен; 4,5 Широк; 5; 5 Много широк; 5 Среден; 5 Тесен; 5 Стандартен; 5 Широк; 5,5; 5,5 Много широк; 5,5 Среден; 5,5 Тесен; 5,5 Стандартен; 5,5 Широк; 6; 6 Много широк; 6 Среден; 6 Тесен; 6 Стандартен; 6 Широк; 6,5; 6,5 Много широк; 6,5 Среден; 6,5 Тесен; 6,5 Стандартен; 6,5 Широк; 7; 7 Много широк; 7 Среден; 7 Тесен; 7 Стандартен; 7 Широк; 7,5; 7,5 Много широк; 7,5 Среден; 7,5 Тесен; 7,5 Стандартен; 7,5 Широк; 8; 8 Много широк; 8 Среден; 8 Тесен; 8 Стандартен; 8 Широк; 8,5; 8,5 Много широк; 8,5 Среден; 8,5 Тесен; 8,5 Стандартен; 8,5 Широк; 9; 9 Много широк; 9 Среден; 9 Тесен; 9 Стандартен; 9 Широк; 9,5; 9,5 Много широк; 9,5 Среден; 9,5 Тесен; 9,5 Стандартен; 9,5 Широк; Друг
lt-LT: JAV vyriškų batų dydis: 1; 1 Ypač platus; 1 Vidutinis; 1 Siauras; 1 Standartinis; 1 Platus; 1,5; 1,5 Ypač platus; 1,5 Vidutinis; 1,5 Siauras; 1,5 Standartinis; 1,5 Platus; 10; 10 Ypač platus; 10 Vidutinis; 10 Siauras; 10 Standartinis; 10 Platus; 10,5; 10,5 Ypač platus; 10,5 Vidutinis; 10,5 Siauras; 10,5 Standartinis; 10,5 Platus; 11; 11 Ypač platus; 11 Vidutinis; 11 Siauras; 11 Standartinis; 11 Platus; 11,5; 11,5 Ypač platus; 11,5 Vidutinis; 11,5 Siauras; 11,5 Standartinis; 11,5 Platus; 12; 12 Ypač platus; 12 Vidutinis; 12 Siauras; 12 Standartinis; 12 Platus; 12,5; 12,5 Ypač platus; 12,5 Vidutinis; 12,5 Siauras; 12,5 Standartinis; 12,5 Platus; 13; 13 Ypač platus; 13 Vidutinis; 13 Siauras; 13 Standartinis; 13 Platus; 13,5; 13,5 Ypač platus; 13,5 Vidutinis; 13,5 Siauras; 13,5 Standartinis; 13,5 Platus; 14; 14 Ypač platus; 14 Vidutinis; 14 Siauras; 14 Standartinis; 14 Platus; 14,5; 14,5 Ypač platus; 14,5 Vidutinis; 14,5 Siauras; 14,5 Standartinis; 14,5 Platus; 15; 15 Ypač platus; 15 Vidutinis; 15 Siauras; 15 Standartinis; 15 Platus; 15,5; 15,5 Ypač platus; 15,5 Vidutinis; 15,5 Siauras; 15,5 Standartinis; 15,5 Platus; 16; 16 Ypač platus; 16 Vidutinis; 16 Siauras; 16 Standartinis; 16 Platus; 16,5; 16,5 Ypač platus; 16,5 Vidutinis; 16,5 Siauras; 16,5 Standartinis; 16,5 Platus; 17; 17 Ypač platus; 17 Vidutinis; 17 Siauras; 17 Standartinis; 17 Platus; 17,5; 17,5 Ypač platus; 17,5 Vidutinis; 17,5 Siauras; 17,5 Standartinis; 17,5 Platus; 18; 18 Ypač platus; 18 Vidutinis; 18 Siauras; 18 Standartinis; 18 Platus; 2; 2 Ypač platus; 2 Vidutinis; 2 Siauras; 2 Standartinis; 2 Platus; 2,5; 2,5 Ypač platus; 2,5 Vidutinis; 2,5 Siauras; 2,5 Standartinis; 2,5 Platus; 3; 3 Ypač platus; 3 Vidutinis; 3 Siauras; 3 Standartinis; 3 Platus; 3,5; 3,5 Ypač platus; 3,5 Vidutinis; 3,5 Siauras; 3,5 Standartinis; 3,5 Platus; 4; 4 Ypač platus; 4 Vidutinis; 4 Siauras; 4 Standartinis; 4 Platus; 4,5; 4,5 Ypač platus; 4,5 Vidutinis; 4,5 Siauras; 4,5 Standartinis; 4,5 Platus; 5; 5 Ypač platus; 5 Vidutinis; 5 Siauras; 5 Standartinis; 5 Platus; 5,5; 5,5 Ypač platus; 5,5 Vidutinis; 5,5 Siauras; 5,5 Standartinis; 5,5 Platus; 6; 6 Ypač platus; 6 Vidutinis; 6 Siauras; 6 Standartinis; 6 Platus; 6,5; 6,5 Ypač platus; 6,5 Vidutinis; 6,5 Siauras; 6,5 Standartinis; 6,5 Platus; 7; 7 Ypač platus; 7 Vidutinis; 7 Siauras; 7 Standartinis; 7 Platus; 7,5; 7,5 Ypač platus; 7,5 Vidutinis; 7,5 Siauras; 7,5 Standartinis; 7,5 Platus; 8; 8 Ypač platus; 8 Vidutinis; 8 Siauras; 8 Standartinis; 8 Platus; 8,5; 8,5 Ypač platus; 8,5 Vidutinis; 8,5 Siauras; 8,5 Standartinis; 8,5 Platus; 9; 9 Ypač platus; 9 Vidutinis; 9 Siauras; 9 Standartinis; 9 Platus; 9,5; 9,5 Ypač platus; 9,5 Vidutinis; 9,5 Siauras; 9,5 Standartinis; 9,5 Platus; Kita
nl: VS schoenmaat mannen: 1; 1 Extra breed; 1 Medium; 1 Smal; 1 Standaard; 1 Breed; 1,5; 1,5 Extra breed; 1,5 Medium; 1,5 Smal; 1,5 Standaard; 1,5 Breed; 10; 10 Extra breed; 10 Medium; 10 Smal; 10 Standaard; 10 Breed; 10,5; 10,5 Extra breed; 10,5 Medium; 10,5 Smal; 10,5 Standaard; 10,5 Breed; 11; 11 Extra breed; 11 Medium; 11 Smal; 11 Standaard; 11 Breed; 11,5; 11,5 Extra breed; 11,5 Medium; 11,5 Smal; 11,5 Standaard; 11,5 Breed; 12; 12 Extra breed; 12 Medium; 12 Smal; 12 Standaard; 12 Breed; 12,5; 12,5 Extra breed; 12,5 Medium; 12,5 Smal; 12,5 Standaard; 12,5 Breed; 13; 13 Extra breed; 13 Medium; 13 Smal; 13 Standaard; 13 Breed; 13,5; 13,5 Extra breed; 13,5 Medium; 13,5 Smal; 13,5 Standaard; 13,5 Breed; 14; 14 Extra breed; 14 Medium; 14 Smal; 14 Standaard; 14 Breed; 14,5; 14,5 Extra breed; 14,5 Medium; 14,5 Smal; 14,5 Standaard; 14,5 Breed; 15; 15 Extra breed; 15 Medium; 15 Smal; 15 Standaard; 15 Breed; 15,5; 15,5 Extra breed; 15,5 Medium; 15,5 Smal; 15,5 Standaard; 15,5 Breed; 16; 16 Extra breed; 16 Medium; 16 Smal; 16 Standaard; 16 Breed; 16,5; 16,5 Extra breed; 16,5 Medium; 16,5 Smal; 16,5 Standaard; 16,5 Breed; 17; 17 Extra breed; 17 Medium; 17 Smal; 17 Standaard; 17 Breed; 17,5; 17,5 Extra breed; 17,5 Medium; 17,5 Smal; 17,5 Standaard; 17,5 Breed; 18; 18 Extra breed; 18 Medium; 18 Smal; 18 Standaard; 18 Breed; 2; 2 Extra breed; 2 Medium; 2 Smal; 2 Standaard; 2 Breed; 2,5; 2,5 Extra breed; 2,5 Medium; 2,5 Smal; 2,5 Standaard; 2,5 Breed; 3; 3 Extra breed; 3 Medium; 3 Smal; 3 Standaard; 3 Breed; 3,5; 3,5 Extra breed; 3,5 Medium; 3,5 Smal; 3,5 Standaard; 3,5 Breed; 4; 4 Extra breed; 4 Medium; 4 Smal; 4 Standaard; 4 Breed; 4,5; 4,5 Extra breed; 4,5 Medium; 4,5 Smal; 4,5 Standaard; 4,5 Breed; 5; 5 Extra breed; 5 Medium; 5 Smal; 5 Standaard; 5 Breed; 5,5; 5,5 Extra breed; 5,5 Medium; 5,5 Smal; 5,5 Standaard; 5,5 Breed; 6; 6 Extra breed; 6 Medium; 6 Smal; 6 Standaard; 6 Breed; 6,5; 6,5 Extra breed; 6,5 Medium; 6,5 Smal; 6,5 Standaard; 6,5 Breed; 7; 7 Extra breed; 7 Medium; 7 Smal; 7 Standaard; 7 Breed; 7,5; 7,5 Extra breed; 7,5 Medium; 7,5 Smal; 7,5 Standaard; 7,5 Breed; 8; 8 Extra breed; 8 Medium; 8 Smal; 8 Standaard; 8 Breed; 8,5; 8,5 Extra breed; 8,5 Medium; 8,5 Smal; 8,5 Standaard; 8,5 Breed; 9; 9 Extra breed; 9 Medium; 9 Smal; 9 Standaard; 9 Breed; 9,5; 9,5 Extra breed; 9,5 Medium; 9,5 Smal; 9,5 Standaard; 9,5 Breed; Overig
de: US-Herrenschuhgröße: 1; 1 Extra weit; 1 Mittel; 1 Schmal; 1 Standard; 1 Weit; 1,5; 1,5 Extra weit; 1,5 Mittel; 1,5 Schmal; 1,5 Standard; 1,5 Weit; 10; 10 Extra weit; 10 Mittel; 10 Schmal; 10 Standard; 10 Weit; 10,5; 10,5 Extra weit; 10,5 Mittel; 10,5 Schmal; 10,5 Standard; 10,5 Weit; 11; 11 Extra weit; 11 Mittel; 11 Schmal; 11 Standard; 11 Weit; 11,5; 11,5 Extra weit; 11,5 Mittel; 11,5 Schmal; 11,5 Standard; 11,5 Weit; 12; 12 Extra weit; 12 Mittel; 12 Schmal; 12 Standard; 12 Weit; 12,5; 12,5 Extra weit; 12,5 Mittel; 12,5 Schmal; 12,5 Standard; 12,5 Weit; 13; 13 Extra weit; 13 Mittel; 13 Schmal; 13 Standard; 13 Weit; 13,5; 13,5 Extra weit; 13,5 Mittel; 13,5 Schmal; 13,5 Standard; 13,5 Weit; 14; 14 Extra weit; 14 Mittel; 14 Schmal; 14 Standard; 14 Weit; 14,5; 14,5 Extra weit; 14,5 Mittel; 14,5 Schmal; 14,5 Standard; 14,5 Weit; 15; 15 Extra weit; 15 Mittel; 15 Schmal; 15 Standard; 15 Weit; 15,5; 15,5 Extra weit; 15,5 Mittel; 15,5 Schmal; 15,5 Standard; 15,5 Weit; 16; 16 Extra weit; 16 Mittel; 16 Schmal; 16 Standard; 16 Weit; 16,5; 16,5 Extra weit; 16,5 Mittel; 16,5 Schmal; 16,5 Standard; 16,5 Weit; 17; 17 Extra weit; 17 Mittel; 17 Schmal; 17 Standard; 17 Weit; 17,5; 17,5 Extra weit; 17,5 Mittel; 17,5 Schmal; 17,5 Standard; 17,5 Weit; 18; 18 Extra weit; 18 Mittel; 18 Schmal; 18 Standard; 18 Weit; 2; 2 Extra weit; 2 Mittel; 2 Schmal; 2 Standard; 2 Weit; 2,5; 2,5 Extra weit; 2,5 Mittel; 2,5 Schmal; 2,5 Standard; 2,5 Weit; 3; 3 Extra weit; 3 Mittel; 3 Schmal; 3 Standard; 3 Weit; 3,5; 3,5 Extra weit; 3,5 Mittel; 3,5 Schmal; 3,5 Standard; 3,5 Weit; 4; 4 Extra weit; 4 Mittel; 4 Schmal; 4 Standard; 4 Weit; 4,5; 4,5 Extra weit; 4,5 Mittel; 4,5 Schmal; 4,5 Standard; 4,5 Weit; 5; 5 Extra weit; 5 Mittel; 5 Schmal; 5 Standard; 5 Weit; 5,5; 5,5 Extra weit; 5,5 Mittel; 5,5 Schmal; 5,5 Standard; 5,5 Weit; 6; 6 Extra weit; 6 Mittel; 6 Schmal; 6 Standard; 6 Weit; 6,5; 6,5 Extra weit; 6,5 Mittel; 6,5 Schmal; 6,5 Standard; 6,5 Weit; 7; 7 Extra weit; 7 Mittel; 7 Schmal; 7 Standard; 7 Weit; 7,5; 7,5 Extra weit; 7,5 Mittel; 7,5 Schmal; 7,5 Standard; 7,5 Weit; 8; 8 Extra weit; 8 Mittel; 8 Schmal; 8 Standard; 8 Weit; 8,5; 8,5 Extra weit; 8,5 Mittel; 8,5 Schmal; 8,5 Standard; 8,5 Weit; 9; 9 Extra weit; 9 Mittel; 9 Schmal; 9 Standard; 9 Weit; 9,5; 9,5 Extra weit; 9,5 Mittel; 9,5 Schmal; 9,5 Standard; 9,5 Weit; Sonstige
hu: USA férficipő-méret: 1; 1 extra széles; 1 közepes; 1 keskeny; 1 normál; 1 széles; 1,5; 1,5 extra széles; 1,5 közepes; 1,5 keskeny; 1,5 normál; 1,5 széles; 10; 10 extra széles; 10 közepes; 10 keskeny; 10 normál; 10 széles; 10,5; 10,5 extra széles; 10,5 közepes; 10,5 keskeny; 10,5 normál; 10,5 széles; 11; 11 extra széles; 11 közepes; 11 keskeny; 11 normál; 11 széles; 11,5; 11,5 extra széles; 11,5 közepes; 11,5 keskeny; 11,5 normál; 11,5 széles; 12; 12 extra széles; 12 közepes; 12 keskeny; 12 normál; 12 széles; 12,5; 12,5 extra széles; 12,5 közepes; 12,5 keskeny; 12,5 normál; 12,5 széles; 13; 13 extra széles; 13 közepes; 13 keskeny; 13 normál; 13 széles; 13,5; 13,5 extra széles; 13,5 közepes; 13,5 keskeny; 13,5 normál; 13,5 széles; 14; 14 extra széles; 14 közepes; 14 keskeny; 14 normál; 14 széles; 14,5; 14,5 extra széles; 14,5 közepes; 14,5 keskeny; 14,5 normál; 14,5 széles; 15; 15 extra széles; 15 közepes; 15 keskeny; 15 normál; 15 széles; 15,5; 15,5 extra széles; 15,5 közepes; 15,5 keskeny; 15,5 normál; 15,5 széles; 16; 16 extra széles; 16 közepes; 16 keskeny; 16 normál; 16 széles; 16,5; 16,5 extra széles; 16,5 közepes; 16,5 keskeny; 16,5 normál; 16,5 széles; 17; 17 extra széles; 17 közepes; 17 keskeny; 17 normál; 17 széles; 17,5; 17,5 extra széles; 17,5 közepes; 17,5 keskeny; 17,5 normál; 17,5 széles; 18; 18 extra széles; 18 közepes; 18 keskeny; 18 normál; 18 széles; 2; 2 extra széles; 2 közepes; 2 keskeny; 2 normál; 2 széles; 2,5; 2,5 extra széles; 2,5 közepes; 2,5 keskeny; 2,5 normál; 2,5 széles; 3; 3 extra széles; 3 közepes; 3 keskeny; 3 normál; 3 széles; 3,5; 3,5 extra széles; 3,5 közepes; 3,5 keskeny; 3,5 normál; 3,5 széles; 4; 4 extra széles; 4 közepes; 4 keskeny; 4 normál; 4 széles; 4,5; 4,5 extra széles; 4,5 közepes; 4,5 keskeny; 4,5 normál; 4,5 széles; 5; 5 extra széles; 5 közepes; 5 keskeny; 5 normál; 5 széles; 5,5; 5,5 extra széles; 5,5 közepes; 5,5 keskeny; 5,5 normál; 5,5 széles; 6; 6 extra széles; 6 közepes; 6 keskeny; 6 normál; 6 széles; 6,5; 6,5 extra széles; 6,5 közepes; 6,5 keskeny; 6,5 normál; 6,5 széles; 7; 7 extra széles; 7 közepes; 7 keskeny; 7 normál; 7 széles; 7,5; 7,5 extra széles; 7,5 közepes; 7,5 keskeny; 7,5 normál; 7,5 széles; 8; 8 extra széles; 8 közepes; 8 keskeny; 8 normál; 8 széles; 8,5; 8,5 extra széles; 8,5 közepes; 8,5 keskeny; 8,5 normál; 8,5 széles; 9; 9 extra széles; 9 közepes; 9 keskeny; 9 normál; 9 széles; 9,5; 9,5 extra széles; 9,5 közepes; 9,5 keskeny; 9,5 normál; 9,5 széles; Egyéb
fi: Yhdysvaltojen miesten kenkäkoko: 1; 1 erittäin leveä; 1 normaali; 1 kapea; 1 vakio; 1 leveä; 1,5; 1,5 erittäin leveä; 1,5 normaali; 1,5 kapea; 1,5 vakio; 1,5 leveä; 10; 10 erittäin leveä; 10 normaali; 10 kapea; 10 vakio; 10 leveä; 10,5; 10,5 erittäin leveä; 10,5 normaali; 10,5 kapea; 10,5 vakio; 10,5 leveä; 11; 11 erittäin leveä; 11 normaali; 11 kapea; 11 vakio; 11 leveä; 11,5; 11,5 erittäin leveä; 11,5 normaali; 11,5 kapea; 11,5 vakio; 11,5 leveä; 12; 12 erittäin leveä; 12 normaali; 12 kapea; 12 vakio; 12 leveä; 12,5; 12,5 erittäin leveä; 12,5 normaali; 12,5 kapea; 12,5 vakio; 12,5 leveä; 13; 13 erittäin leveä; 13 normaali; 13 kapea; 13 vakio; 13 leveä; 13,5; 13,5 erittäin leveä; 13,5 normaali; 13,5 kapea; 13,5 vakio; 13,5 leveä; 14; 14 erittäin leveä; 14 normaali; 14 kapea; 14 vakio; 14 leveä; 14,5; 14,5 erittäin leveä; 14,5 normaali; 14,5 kapea; 14,5 vakio; 14,5 leveä; 15; 15 erittäin leveä; 15 normaali; 15 kapea; 15 vakio; 15 leveä; 15,5; 15,5 erittäin leveä; 15,5 normaali; 15,5 kapea; 15,5 vakio; 15,5 leveä; 16; 16 erittäin leveä; 16 normaali; 16 kapea; 16 vakio; 16 leveä; 16,5; 16,5 erittäin leveä; 16,5 normaali; 16,5 kapea; 16,5 vakio; 16,5 leveä; 17; 17 erittäin leveä; 17 normaali; 17 kapea; 17 vakio; 17 leveä; 17,5; 17,5 erittäin leveä; 17,5 normaali; 17,5 kapea; 17,5 vakio; 17,5 leveä; 18; 18 erittäin leveä; 18 normaali; 18 kapea; 18 vakio; 18 leveä; 2; 2 erittäin leveä; 2 normaali; 2 kapea; 2 vakio; 2 leveä; 2,5; 2,5 erittäin leveä; 2,5 normaali; 2,5 kapea; 2,5 vakio; 2,5 leveä; 3; 3 erittäin leveä; 3 normaali; 3 kapea; 3 vakio; 3 leveä; 3,5; 3,5 erittäin leveä; 3,5 normaali; 3,5 kapea; 3,5 vakio; 3,5 leveä; 4; 4 erittäin leveä; 4 normaali; 4 kapea; 4 vakio; 4 leveä; 4,5; 4,5 erittäin leveä; 4,5 normaali; 4,5 kapea; 4,5 vakio; 4,5 leveä; 5; 5 erittäin leveä; 5 normaali; 5 kapea; 5 vakio; 5 leveä; 5,5; 5,5 erittäin leveä; 5,5 normaali; 5,5 kapea; 5,5 vakio; 5,5 leveä; 6; 6 erittäin leveä; 6 normaali; 6 kapea; 6 vakio; 6 leveä; 6,5; 6,5 erittäin leveä; 6,5 normaali; 6,5 kapea; 6,5 vakio; 6,5 leveä; 7; 7 erittäin leveä; 7 normaali; 7 kapea; 7 vakio; 7 leveä; 7,5; 7,5 erittäin leveä; 7,5 normaali; 7,5 kapea; 7,5 vakio; 7,5 leveä; 8; 8 erittäin leveä; 8 normaali; 8 kapea; 8 vakio; 8 leveä; 8,5; 8,5 erittäin leveä; 8,5 normaali; 8,5 kapea; 8,5 vakio; 8,5 leveä; 9; 9 erittäin leveä; 9 normaali; 9 kapea; 9 vakio; 9 leveä; 9,5; 9,5 erittäin leveä; 9,5 normaali; 9,5 kapea; 9,5 vakio; 9,5 leveä; Muu
nb: Amerikansk størrelse for herresko: 1; 1 ekstra bred; 1 medium; 1 smal; 1 standard; 1 bred; 1,5; 1,5 ekstra bred; 1,5 medium; 1,5 smal; 1,5 standard; 1,5 bred; 10; 10 ekstra bred; 10 medium; 10 smal; 10 standard; 10 bred; 10,5; 10,5 ekstra bred; 10,5 medium; 10,5 smal; 10,5 standard; 10,5 bred; 11; 11 ekstra bred; 11 medium; 11 smal; 11 standard; 11 bred; 11,5; 11,5 ekstra bred; 11,5 medium; 11,5 smal; 11,5 standard; 11,5 bred; 12; 12 ekstra bred; 12 medium; 12 smal; 12 standard; 12 bred; 12,5; 12,5 ekstra bred; 12,5 medium; 12,5 smal; 12,5 standard; 12,5 bred; 13; 13 ekstra bred; 13 medium; 13 smal; 13 standard; 13 bred; 13,5; 13,5 ekstra bred; 13,5 medium; 13,5 smal; 13,5 standard; 13,5 bred; 14; 14 ekstra bred; 14 medium; 14 smal; 14 standard; 14 bred; 14,5; 14,5 ekstra bred; 14,5 medium; 14,5 smal; 14,5 standard; 14,5 bred; 15; 15 ekstra bred; 15 medium; 15 smal; 15 standard; 15 bred; 15,5; 15,5 ekstra bred; 15,5 medium; 15,5 smal; 15,5 standard; 15,5 bred; 16; 16 ekstra bred; 16 medium; 16 smal; 16 standard; 16 bred; 16,5; 16,5 ekstra bred; 16,5 medium; 16,5 smal; 16,5 standard; 16,5 bred; 17; 17 ekstra bred; 17 medium; 17 smal; 17 standard; 17 bred; 17,5; 17,5 ekstra bred; 17,5 medium; 17,5 smal; 17,5 standard; 17,5 bred; 18; 18 ekstra bred; 18 medium; 18 smal; 18 standard; 18 bred; 2; 2 ekstra bred; 2 medium; 2 smal; 2 standard; 2 bred; 2,5; 2,5 ekstra bred; 2,5 medium; 2,5 smal; 2,5 standard; 2,5 bred; 3; 3 ekstra bred; 3 medium; 3 smal; 3 standard; 3 bred; 3,5; 3,5 ekstra bred; 3,5 medium; 3,5 smal; 3,5 standard; 3,5 bred; 4; 4 ekstra bred; 4 medium; 4 smal; 4 standard; 4 bred; 4,5; 4,5 ekstra bred; 4,5 medium; 4,5 smal; 4,5 standard; 4,5 bred; 5; 5 ekstra bred; 5 medium; 5 smal; 5 standard; 5 bred; 5,5; 5,5 ekstra bred; 5,5 medium; 5,5 smal; 5,5 standard; 5,5 bred; 6; 6 ekstra bred; 6 medium; 6 smal; 6 standard; 6 bred; 6,5; 6,5 ekstra bred; 6,5 medium; 6,5 smal; 6,5 standard; 6,5 bred; 7; 7 ekstra bred; 7 medium; 7 smal; 7 standard; 7 bred; 7,5; 7,5 ekstra bred; 7,5 medium; 7,5 smal; 7,5 standard; 7,5 bred; 8; 8 ekstra bred; 8 medium; 8 smal; 8 standard; 8 bred; 8,5; 8,5 ekstra bred; 8,5 medium; 8,5 smal; 8,5 standard; 8,5 bred; 9; 9 ekstra bred; 9 medium; 9 smal; 9 standard; 9 bred; 9,5; 9,5 ekstra bred; 9,5 medium; 9,5 smal; 9,5 standard; 9,5 bred; Annet
es: Número de zapato de hombres de EE. UU.: 1; 1 extra ancho; 1 medio; 1 estrecho; 1 estándar; 1 ancho; 1,5; 1,5 extra ancho; 1,5 medio; 1,5 estrecho; 1,5 estándar; 1,5 ancho; 10; 10 extra ancho; 10 medio; 10 estrecho; 10 estándar; 10 ancho; 10,5; 10,5 extra ancho; 10,5 medio; 10,5 estrecho; 10,5 estándar; 10,5 ancho; 11; 11 extra ancho; 11 medio; 11 estrecho; 11 estándar; 11 ancho; 11,5; 11,5 extra ancho; 11,5 medio; 11,5 estrecho; 11,5 estándar; 11,5 ancho; 12; 12 extra ancho; 12 medio; 12 estrecho; 12 estándar; 12 ancho; 12,5; 12,5 extra ancho; 12,5 medio; 12,5 estrecho; 12,5 estándar; 12,5 ancho; 13; 13 extra ancho; 13 medio; 13 estrecho; 13 estándar; 13 ancho; 13,5; 13,5 extra ancho; 13,5 medio; 13,5 estrecho; 13,5 estándar; 13,5 ancho; 14; 14 extra ancho; 14 medio; 14 estrecho; 14 estándar; 14 ancho; 14,5; 14,5 extra ancho; 14,5 medio; 14,5 estrecho; 14,5 estándar; 14,5 ancho; 15; 15 extra ancho; 15 medio; 15 estrecho; 15 estándar; 15 ancho; 15,5; 15,5 extra ancho; 15,5 medio; 15,5 estrecho; 15,5 estándar; 15,5 ancho; 16; 16 extra ancho; 16 medio; 16 estrecho; 16 estándar; 16 ancho; 16,5; 16,5 extra ancho; 16,5 medio; 16,5 estrecho; 16,5 estándar; 16,5 ancho; 17; 17 extra ancho; 17 medio; 17 estrecho; 17 estándar; 17 ancho; 17,5; 17,5 extra ancho; 17,5 medio; 17,5 estrecho; 17,5 estándar; 17,5 ancho; 18; 18 extra ancho; 18 medio; 18 estrecho; 18 estándar; 18 ancho; 2; 2 extra ancho; 2 medio; 2 estrecho; 2 estándar; 2 ancho; 2,5; 2,5 extra ancho; 2,5 medio; 2,5 estrecho; 2,5 estándar; 2,5 ancho; 3; 3 extra ancho; 3 medio; 3 estrecho; 3 estándar; 3 ancho; 3,5; 3,5 extra ancho; 3,5 medio; 3,5 estrecho; 3,5 estándar; 3,5 ancho; 4; 4 extra ancho; 4 medio; 4 estrecho; 4 estándar; 4 ancho; 4,5; 4,5 extra ancho; 4,5 medio; 4,5 estrecho; 4,5 estándar; 4,5 ancho; 5; 5 extra ancho; 5 medio; 5 estrecho; 5 estándar; 5 ancho; 5,5; 5,5 extra ancho; 5,5 medio; 5,5 estrecho; 5,5 estándar; 5,5 ancho; 6; 6 extra ancho; 6 medio; 6 estrecho; 6 estándar; 6 ancho; 6,5; 6,5 extra ancho; 6,5 medio; 6,5 estrecho; 6,5 estándar; 6,5 ancho; 7; 7 extra ancho; 7 medio; 7 estrecho; 7 estándar; 7 ancho; 7,5; 7,5 extra ancho; 7,5 medio; 7,5 estrecho; 7,5 estándar; 7,5 ancho; 8; 8 extra ancho; 8 medio; 8 estrecho; 8 estándar; 8 ancho; 8,5; 8,5 extra ancho; 8,5 medio; 8,5 estrecho; 8,5 estándar; 8,5 ancho; 9; 9 extra ancho; 9 medio; 9 estrecho; 9 estándar; 9 ancho; 9,5; 9,5 extra ancho; 9,5 medio; 9,5 estrecho; 9,5 estándar; 9,5 ancho; Otro
fr: Pointures de chaussures pour hommes aux États-Unis: 1; 1 Très large; 1 Moyen; 1 Étroit; 1 Standard; 1 Large; 1,5; 1,5 Très large; 1,5 Moyen; 1,5 Étroit; 1,5 Standard; 1,5 Large; 10; 10 Très large; 10 Moyen; 10 Étroit; 10 Standard; 10 Large; 10,5; 10,5 Très large; 10,5 Moyen; 10,5 Étroit; 10,5 Standard; 10,5 Large; 11; 11 Très large; 11 Moyen; 11 Étroit; 11 Standard; 11 Large; 11,5; 11,5 Très large; 11,5 Moyen; 11,5 Étroit; 11,5 Standard; 11,5 Large; 12; 12 Très large; 12 Moyen; 12 Étroit; 12 Standard; 12 Large; 12,5; 12,5 Très large; 12,5 Moyen; 12,5 Étroit; 12,5 Standard; 12,5 Large; 13; 13 Très large; 13 Moyen; 13 Étroit; 13 Standard; 13 Large; 13,5; 13,5 Très large; 13,5 Moyen; 13,5 Étroit; 13,5 Standard; 13,5 Large; 14; 14 Très large; 14 Moyen; 14 Étroit; 14 Standard; 14 Large; 14,5; 14,5 Très large; 14,5 Moyen; 14,5 Étroit; 14,5 Standard; 14,5 Large; 15; 15 Très large; 15 Moyen; 15 Étroit; 15 Standard; 15 Large; 15,5; 15,5 Très large; 15,5 Moyen; 15,5 Étroit; 15,5 Standard; 15,5 Large; 16; 16 Très large; 16 Moyen; 16 Étroit; 16 Standard; 16 Large; 16,5; 16,5 Très large; 16,5 Moyen; 16,5 Étroit; 16,5 Standard; 16,5 Large; 17; 17 Très large; 17 Moyen; 17 Étroit; 17 Standard; 17 Large; 17,5; 17,5 Très large; 17,5 Moyen; 17,5 Étroit; 17,5 Standard; 17,5 Large; 18; 18 Très large; 18 Moyen; 18 Étroit; 18 Standard; 18 Large; 2; 2 Très large; 2 Moyen; 2 Étroit; 2 Standard; 2 Large; 2,5; 2,5 Très large; 2,5 Moyen; 2,5 Étroit; 2,5 Standard; 2,5 Large; 3; 3 Très large; 3 Moyen; 3 Étroit; 3 Standard; 3 Large; 3,5; 3,5 Très large; 3,5 Moyen; 3,5 Étroit; 3,5 Standard; 3,5 Large; 4; 4 Très large; 4 Moyen; 4 Étroit; 4 Standard; 4 Large; 4,5; 4,5 Très large; 4,5 Moyen; 4,5 Étroit; 4,5 Standard; 4,5 Large; 5; 5 Très large; 5 Moyen; 5 Étroit; 5 Standard; 5 Large; 5,5; 5,5 Très large; 5,5 Moyen; 5,5 Étroit; 5,5 Standard; 5,5 Large; 6; 6 Très large; 6 Moyen; 6 Étroit; 6 Standard; 6 Large; 6,5; 6,5 Très large; 6,5 Moyen; 6,5 Étroit; 6,5 Standard; 6,5 Large; 7; 7 Très large; 7 Moyen; 7 Étroit; 7 Standard; 7 Large; 7,5; 7,5 Très large; 7,5 Moyen; 7,5 Étroit; 7,5 Standard; 7,5 Large; 8; 8 Très large; 8 Moyen; 8 Étroit; 8 Standard; 8 Large; 8,5; 8,5 Très large; 8,5 Moyen; 8,5 Étroit; 8,5 Standard; 8,5 Large; 9; 9 Très large; 9 Moyen; 9 Étroit; 9 Standard; 9 Large; 9,5; 9,5 Très large; 9,5 Moyen; 9,5 Étroit; 9,5 Standard; 9,5 Large; Autre
hr-HR: Veličina muške obuće (SAD): 1; 1 Iznimno široko; 1 Srednje; 1 Usko; 1 Standardno; 1 Široko; 1,5; 1,5 Iznimno široko; 1,5 Srednje; 1,5 Usko; 1,5 Standardno; 1,5 Široko; 10; 10 Iznimno široko; 10 Srednje; 10 Usko; 10 Standardno; 10 Široko; 10,5; 10,5 Iznimno široko; 10,5 Srednje; 10,5 Usko; 10,5 Standardno; 10,5 Široko; 11; 11 Iznimno široko; 11 Srednje; 11 Usko; 11 Standardno; 11 Široko; 11,5; 11,5 Iznimno široko; 11,5 Srednje; 11,5 Usko; 11,5 Standardno; 11,5 Široko; 12; 12 Iznimno široko; 12 Srednje; 12 Usko; 12 Standardno; 12 Široko; 12,5; 12,5 Iznimno široko; 12,5 Srednje; 12,5 Usko; 12,5 Standardno; 12,5 Široko; 13; 13 Iznimno široko; 13 Srednje; 13 Usko; 13 Standardno; 13 Široko; 13,5; 13,5 Iznimno široko; 13,5 Srednje; 13,5 Usko; 13,5 Standardno; 13,5 Široko; 14; 14 Iznimno široko; 14 Srednje; 14 Usko; 14 Standardno; 14 Široko; 14,5; 14,5 Iznimno široko; 14,5 Srednje; 14,5 Usko; 14,5 Standardno; 14,5 Široko; 15; 15 Iznimno široko; 15 Srednje; 15 Usko; 15 Standardno; 15 Široko; 15,5; 15,5 Iznimno široko; 15,5 Srednje; 15,5 Usko; 15,5 Standardno; 15,5 Široko; 16; 16 Iznimno široko; 16 Srednje; 16 Usko; 16 Standardno; 16 Široko; 16,5; 16,5 Iznimno široko; 16,5 Srednje; 16,5 Usko; 16,5 Standardno; 16,5 Široko; 17; 17 Iznimno široko; 17 Srednje; 17 Usko; 17 Standardno; 17 Široko; 17,5; 17,5 Iznimno široko; 17,5 Srednje; 17,5 Usko; 17,5 Standardno; 17,5 Široko; 18; 18 Iznimno široko; 18 Srednje; 18 Usko; 18 Standardno; 18 Široko; 2; 2 Iznimno široko; 2 Srednje; 2 Usko; 2 Standardno; 2 Široko; 2,5; 2,5 Iznimno široko; 2,5 Srednje; 2,5 Usko; 2,5 Standardno; 2,5 Široko; 3; 3 Iznimno široko; 3 Srednje; 3 Usko; 3 Standardno; 3 Široko; 3,5; 3,5 Iznimno široko; 3,5 Srednje; 3,5 Usko; 3,5 Standardno; 3,5 Široko; 4; 4 Iznimno široko; 4 Srednje; 4 Usko; 4 Standardno; 4 Široko; 4,5; 4,5 Iznimno široko; 4,5 Srednje; 4,5 Usko; 4,5 Standardno; 4,5 Široko; 5; 5 Iznimno široko; 5 Srednje; 5 Usko; 5 Standardno; 5 Široko; 5,5; 5,5 Iznimno široko; 5,5 Srednje; 5,5 Usko; 5,5 Standardno; 5,5 Široko; 6; 6 Iznimno široko; 6 Srednje; 6 Usko; 6 Standardno; 6 Široko; 6,5; 6,5 Iznimno široko; 6,5 Srednje; 6,5 Usko; 6,5 Standardno; 6,5 Široko; 7; 7 Iznimno široko; 7 Srednje; 7 Usko; 7 Standardno; 7 Široko; 7,5; 7,5 Iznimno široko; 7,5 Srednje; 7,5 Usko; 7,5 Standardno; 7,5 Široko; 8; 8 Iznimno široko; 8 Srednje; 8 Usko; 8 Standardno; 8 Široko; 8,5; 8,5 Iznimno široko; 8,5 Srednje; 8,5 Usko; 8,5 Standardno; 8,5 Široko; 9; 9 Iznimno široko; 9 Srednje; 9 Usko; 9 Standardno; 9 Široko; 9,5; 9,5 Iznimno široko; 9,5 Srednje; 9,5 Usko; 9,5 Standardno; 9,5 Široko; Ostalo
ja: 米国男性用靴の寸法: 1; 1 エクストラワイド; 1 ミディアム; 1 ナロー; 1 スタンダード; 1 ワイド; 1.5; 1.5 エクストラワイド; 1.5 ミディアム; 1.5 ナロー; 1.5 スタンダード; 1.5 ワイド; 10; 10 エクストラワイド; 10 ミディアム; 10 ナロー; 10 スタンダード; 10 ワイド; 10.5; 10.5 エクストラワイド; 10.5 ミディアム; 10.5 ナロー; 10.5 スタンダード; 10.5 ワイド; 11; 11 エクストラワイド; 11 ミディアム; 11 ナロー; 11 スタンダード; 11 ワイド; 11.5; 11.5 エクストラワイド; 11.5 ミディアム; 11.5 ナロー; 11.5 スタンダード; 11.5 ワイド; 12; 12 エクストラワイド; 12 ミディアム; 12 ナロー; 12 スタンダード; 12 ワイド; 12.5; 12.5 エクストラワイド; 12.5 ミディアム; 12.5 ナロー; 12.5 スタンダード; 12.5 ワイド; 13; 13 エクストラワイド; 13 ミディアム; 13 ナロー; 13 スタンダード; 13 ワイド; 13.5; 13.5 エクストラワイド; 13.5 ミディアム; 13.5 ナロー; 13.5 スタンダード; 13.5 ワイド; 14; 14 エクストラワイド; 14 ミディアム; 14 ナロー; 14 スタンダード; 14 ワイド; 14.5; 14.5 エクストラワイド; 14.5 ミディアム; 14.5 ナロー; 14.5 スタンダード; 14.5 ワイド; 15; 15 エクストラワイド; 15 ミディアム; 15 ナロー; 15 スタンダード; 15 ワイド; 15.5; 15.5 エクストラワイド; 15.5 ミディアム; 15.5 ナロー; 15.5 スタンダード; 15.5 ワイド; 16; 16 エクストラワイド; 16 ミディアム; 16 ナロー; 16 スタンダード; 16 ワイド; 16.5; 16.5 エクストラワイド; 16.5 ミディアム; 16.5 ナロー; 16.5 スタンダード; 16.5 ワイド; 17; 17 エクストラワイド; 17 ミディアム; 17 ナロー; 17 スタンダード; 17 ワイド; 17.5; 17.5 エクストラワイド; 17.5 ミディアム; 17.5 ナロー; 17.5 スタンダード; 17.5 ワイド; 18; 18 エクストラワイド; 18 ミディアム; 18 ナロー; 18 スタンダード; 18 ワイド; 2; 2 エクストラワイド; 2 ミディアム; 2 ナロー; 2 スタンダード; 2 ワイド; 2.5; 2.5 エクストラワイド; 2.5 ミディアム; 2.5 ナロー; 2.5 スタンダード; 2.5 ワイド; 3; 3 エクストラワイド; 3 ミディアム; 3 ナロー; 3 スタンダード; 3 ワイド; 3.5; 3.5 エクストラワイド; 3.5 ミディアム; 3.5 ナロー; 3.5 スタンダード; 3.5 ワイド; 4; 4 エクストラワイド; 4 ミディアム; 4 ナロー; 4 スタンダード; 4 ワイド; 4.5; 4.5 エクストラワイド; 4.5 ミディアム; 4.5 ナロー; 4.5 スタンダード; 4.5 ワイド; 5; 5 エクストラワイド; 5 ミディアム; 5 ナロー; 5 スタンダード; 5 ワイド; 5.5; 5.5 エクストラワイド; 5.5 ミディアム; 5.5 ナロー; 5.5 スタンダード; 5.5 ワイド; 6; 6 エクストラワイド; 6 ミディアム; 6 ナロー; 6 スタンダード; 6 ワイド; 6.5; 6.5 エクストラワイド; 6.5 ミディアム; 6.5 ナロー; 6.5 スタンダード; 6.5 ワイド; 7; 7 エクストラワイド; 7 ミディアム; 7 ナロー; 7 スタンダード; 7 ワイド; 7.5; 7.5 エクストラワイド; 7.5 ミディアム; 7.5 ナロー; 7.5 スタンダード; 7.5 ワイド; 8; 8 エクストラワイド; 8 ミディアム; 8 ナロー; 8 スタンダード; 8 ワイド; 8.5; 8.5 エクストラワイド; 8.5 ミディアム; 8.5 ナロー; 8.5 スタンダード; 8.5 ワイド; 9; 9 エクストラワイド; 9 ミディアム; 9 ナロー; 9 スタンダード; 9 ワイド; 9.5; 9.5 エクストラワイド; 9.5 ミディアム; 9.5 ナロー; 9.5 スタンダード; 9.5 ワイド; その他
en: US men's shoe size: 1; 1 Extra Wide; 1 Medium; 1 Narrow; 1 Standard; 1 Wide; 1.5; 1.5 Extra Wide; 1.5 Medium; 1.5 Narrow; 1.5 Standard; 1.5 Wide; 10; 10 Extra Wide; 10 Medium; 10 Narrow; 10 Standard; 10 Wide; 10.5; 10.5 Extra Wide; 10.5 Medium; 10.5 Narrow; 10.5 Standard; 10.5 Wide; 11; 11 Extra Wide; 11 Medium; 11 Narrow; 11 Standard; 11 Wide; 11.5; 11.5 Extra Wide; 11.5 Medium; 11.5 Narrow; 11.5 Standard; 11.5 Wide; 12; 12 Extra Wide; 12 Medium; 12 Narrow; 12 Standard; 12 Wide; 12.5; 12.5 Extra Wide; 12.5 Medium; 12.5 Narrow; 12.5 Standard; 12.5 Wide; 13; 13 Extra Wide; 13 Medium; 13 Narrow; 13 Standard; 13 Wide; 13.5; 13.5 Extra Wide; 13.5 Medium; 13.5 Narrow; 13.5 Standard; 13.5 Wide; 14; 14 Extra Wide; 14 Medium; 14 Narrow; 14 Standard; 14 Wide; 14.5; 14.5 Extra Wide; 14.5 Medium; 14.5 Narrow; 14.5 Standard; 14.5 Wide; 15; 15 Extra Wide; 15 Medium; 15 Narrow; 15 Standard; 15 Wide; 15.5; 15.5 Extra Wide; 15.5 Medium; 15.5 Narrow; 15.5 Standard; 15.5 Wide; 16; 16 Extra Wide; 16 Medium; 16 Narrow; 16 Standard; 16 Wide; 16.5; 16.5 Extra Wide; 16.5 Medium; 16.5 Narrow; 16.5 Standard; 16.5 Wide; 17; 17 Extra Wide; 17 Medium; 17 Narrow; 17 Standard; 17 Wide; 17.5; 17.5 Extra Wide; 17.5 Medium; 17.5 Narrow; 17.5 Standard; 17.5 Wide; 18; 18 Extra Wide; 18 Medium; 18 Narrow; 18 Standard; 18 Wide; 2; 2 Extra Wide; 2 Medium; 2 Narrow; 2 Standard; 2 Wide; 2.5; 2.5 Extra Wide; 2.5 Medium; 2.5 Narrow; 2.5 Standard; 2.5 Wide; 3; 3 Extra Wide; 3 Medium; 3 Narrow; 3 Standard; 3 Wide; 3.5; 3.5 Extra Wide; 3.5 Medium; 3.5 Narrow; 3.5 Standard; 3.5 Wide; 4; 4 Extra Wide; 4 Medium; 4 Narrow; 4 Standard; 4 Wide; 4.5; 4.5 Extra Wide; 4.5 Medium; 4.5 Narrow; 4.5 Standard; 4.5 Wide; 5; 5 Extra Wide; 5 Medium; 5 Narrow; 5 Standard; 5 Wide; 5.5; 5.5 Extra Wide; 5.5 Medium; 5.5 Narrow; 5.5 Standard; 5.5 Wide; 6; 6 Extra Wide; 6 Medium; 6 Narrow; 6 Standard; 6 Wide; 6.5; 6.5 Extra Wide; 6.5 Medium; 6.5 Narrow; 6.5 Standard; 6.5 Wide; 7; 7 Extra Wide; 7 Medium; 7 Narrow; 7 Standard; 7 Wide; 7.5; 7.5 Extra Wide; 7.5 Medium; 7.5 Narrow; 7.5 Standard; 7.5 Wide; 8; 8 Extra Wide; 8 Medium; 8 Narrow; 8 Standard; 8 Wide; 8.5; 8.5 Extra Wide; 8.5 Medium; 8.5 Narrow; 8.5 Standard; 8.5 Wide; 9; 9 Extra Wide; 9 Medium; 9 Narrow; 9 Standard; 9 Wide; 9.5; 9.5 Extra Wide; 9.5 Medium; 9.5 Narrow; 9.5 Standard; 9.5 Wide; Other
pt-BR: Tamanho do sapato masculino nos EUA: 1; 1 Extralargo; 1 Médio; 1 Estreito; 1 Padrão; 1 Largo; 1,5; 1,5 Extralargo; 1,5 Médio; 1,5 Estreito; 1,5 Padrão; 1,5 Largo; 10; 10 Extralargo; 10 Médio; 10 Estreito; 10 Padrão; 10 Largo; 10,5; 10,5 Extralargo; 10,5 Médio; 10,5 Estreito; 10,5 Padrão; 10,5 Largo; 11; 11 Extralargo; 11 Médio; 11 Estreito; 11 Padrão; 11 Largo; 11,5; 11,5 Extralargo; 11,5 Médio; 11,5 Estreito; 11,5 Padrão; 11,5 Largo; 12; 12 Extralargo; 12 Médio; 12 Estreito; 12 Padrão; 12 Largo; 12,5; 12,5 Extralargo; 12,5 Médio; 12,5 Estreito; 12,5 Padrão; 12,5 Largo; 13; 13 Extralargo; 13 Médio; 13 Estreito; 13 Padrão; 13 Largo; 13,5; 13,5 Extralargo; 13,5 Médio; 13,5 Estreito; 13,5 Padrão; 13,5 Largo; 14; 14 Extralargo; 14 Médio; 14 Estreito; 14 Padrão; 14 Largo; 14,5; 14,5 Extralargo; 14,5 Médio; 14,5 Estreito; 14,5 Padrão; 14,5 Largo; 15; 15 Extralargo; 15 Médio; 15 Estreito; 15 Padrão; 15 Largo; 15,5; 15,5 Extralargo; 15,5 Médio; 15,5 Estreito; 15,5 Padrão; 15,5 Largo; 16; 16 Extralargo; 16 Médio; 16 Estreito; 16 Padrão; 16 Largo; 16,5; 16,5 Extralargo; 16,5 Médio; 16,5 Estreito; 16,5 Padrão; 16,5 Largo; 17; 17 Extralargo; 17 Médio; 17 Estreito; 17 Padrão; 17 Largo; 17,5; 17,5 Extralargo; 17,5 Médio; 17,5 Estreito; 17,5 Padrão; 17,5 Largo; 18; 18 Extralargo; 18 Médio; 18 Estreito; 18 Padrão; 18 Largo; 2; 2 Extralargo; 2 Médio; 2 Estreito; 2 Padrão; 2 Largo; 2,5; 2,5 Extralargo; 2,5 Médio; 2,5 Estreito; 2,5 Padrão; 2,5 Largo; 3; 3 Extralargo; 3 Médio; 3 Estreito; 3 Padrão; 3 Largo; 3,5; 3,5 Extralargo; 3,5 Médio; 3,5 Estreito; 3,5 Padrão; 3,5 Largo; 4; 4 Extralargo; 4 Médio; 4 Estreito; 4 Padrão; 4 Largo; 4,5; 4,5 Extralargo; 4,5 Médio; 4,5 Estreito; 4,5 Padrão; 4,5 Largo; 5; 5 Extralargo; 5 Médio; 5 Estreito; 5 Padrão; 5 Largo; 5,5; 5,5 Extralargo; 5,5 Médio; 5,5 Estreito; 5,5 Padrão; 5,5 Largo; 6; 6 Extralargo; 6 Médio; 6 Estreito; 6 Padrão; 6 Largo; 6,5; 6,5 Extralargo; 6,5 Médio; 6,5 Estreito; 6,5 Padrão; 6,5 Largo; 7; 7 Extralargo; 7 Médio; 7 Estreito; 7 Padrão; 7 Largo; 7,5; 7,5 Extralargo; 7,5 Médio; 7,5 Estreito; 7,5 Padrão; 7,5 Largo; 8; 8 Extralargo; 8 Médio; 8 Estreito; 8 Padrão; 8 Largo; 8,5; 8,5 Extralargo; 8,5 Médio; 8,5 Estreito; 8,5 Padrão; 8,5 Largo; 9; 9 Extralargo; 9 Médio; 9 Estreito; 9 Padrão; 9 Largo; 9,5; 9,5 Extralargo; 9,5 Médio; 9,5 Estreito; 9,5 Padrão; 9,5 Largo; Outro
tr: ABD erkek ayakkabı numarası: 1; 1 Ekstra Geniş; 1 Orta; 1 Dar; 1 Standart; 1 Geniş; 1,5; 1,5 Ekstra Geniş; 1,5 Orta; 1,5 Dar; 1,5 Standart; 1,5 Geniş; 10; 10 Ekstra Geniş; 10 Orta; 10 Dar; 10 Standart; 10 Geniş; 10,5; 10,5 Ekstra Geniş; 10,5 Orta; 10,5 Dar; 10,5 Standart; 10,5 Geniş; 11; 11 Ekstra Geniş; 11 Orta; 11 Dar; 11 Standart; 11 Geniş; 11,5; 11,5 Ekstra Geniş; 11,5 Orta; 11,5 Dar; 11,5 Standart; 11,5 Geniş; 12; 12 Ekstra Geniş; 12 Orta; 12 Dar; 12 Standart; 12 Geniş; 12,5; 12,5 Ekstra Geniş; 12,5 Orta; 12,5 Dar; 12,5 Standart; 12,5 Geniş; 13; 13 Ekstra Geniş; 13 Orta; 13 Dar; 13 Standart; 13 Geniş; 13,5; 13,5 Ekstra Geniş; 13,5 Orta; 13,5 Dar; 13,5 Standart; 13,5 Geniş; 14; 14 Ekstra Geniş; 14 Orta; 14 Dar; 14 Standart; 14 Geniş; 14,5; 14,5 Ekstra Geniş; 14,5 Orta; 14,5 Dar; 14,5 Standart; 14,5 Geniş; 15; 15 Ekstra Geniş; 15 Orta; 15 Dar; 15 Standart; 15 Geniş; 15,5; 15,5 Ekstra Geniş; 15,5 Orta; 15,5 Dar; 15,5 Standart; 15,5 Geniş; 16; 16 Ekstra Geniş; 16 Orta; 16 Dar; 16 Standart; 16 Geniş; 16,5; 16,5 Ekstra Geniş; 16,5 Orta; 16,5 Dar; 16,5 Standart; 16,5 Geniş; 17; 17 Ekstra Geniş; 17 Orta; 17 Dar; 17 Standart; 17 Geniş; 17,5; 17,5 Ekstra Geniş; 17,5 Orta; 17,5 Dar; 17,5 Standart; 17,5 Geniş; 18; 18 Ekstra Geniş; 18 Orta; 18 Dar; 18 Standart; 18 Geniş; 2; 2 Ekstra Geniş; 2 Orta; 2 Dar; 2 Standart; 2 Geniş; 2,5; 2,5 Ekstra Geniş; 2,5 Orta; 2,5 Dar; 2,5 Standart; 2,5 Geniş; 3; 3 Ekstra Geniş; 3 Orta; 3 Dar; 3 Standart; 3 Geniş; 3,5; 3,5 Ekstra Geniş; 3,5 Orta; 3,5 Dar; 3,5 Standart; 3,5 Geniş; 4; 4 Ekstra Geniş; 4 Orta; 4 Dar; 4 Standart; 4 Geniş; 4,5; 4,5 Ekstra Geniş; 4,5 Orta; 4,5 Dar; 4,5 Standart; 4,5 Geniş; 5; 5 Ekstra Geniş; 5 Orta; 5 Dar; 5 Standart; 5 Geniş; 5,5; 5,5 Ekstra Geniş; 5,5 Orta; 5,5 Dar; 5,5 Standart; 5,5 Geniş; 6; 6 Ekstra Geniş; 6 Orta; 6 Dar; 6 Standart; 6 Geniş; 6,5; 6,5 Ekstra Geniş; 6,5 Orta; 6,5 Dar; 6,5 Standart; 6,5 Geniş; 7; 7 Ekstra Geniş; 7 Orta; 7 Dar; 7 Standart; 7 Geniş; 7,5; 7,5 Ekstra Geniş; 7,5 Orta; 7,5 Dar; 7,5 Standart; 7,5 Geniş; 8; 8 Ekstra Geniş; 8 Orta; 8 Dar; 8 Standart; 8 Geniş; 8,5; 8,5 Ekstra Geniş; 8,5 Orta; 8,5 Dar; 8,5 Standart; 8,5 Geniş; 9; 9 Ekstra Geniş; 9 Orta; 9 Dar; 9 Standart; 9 Geniş; 9,5; 9,5 Ekstra Geniş; 9,5 Orta; 9,5 Dar; 9,5 Standart; 9,5 Geniş; Diğer
it: Numero di scarpa da uomo US: 1; 1 extra larga; 1 media; 1 stretta; 1 standard; 1 larga; 1,5; 1,5 extra larga; 1,5 media; 1,5 stretta; 1,5 standard; 1,5 larga; 10; 10 extra larga; 10 media; 10 stretta; 10 standard; 10 larga; 10,5; 10,5 extra larga; 10,5 media; 10,5 stretta; 10,5 standard; 10,5 larga; 11; 11 extra larga; 11 media; 11 stretta; 11 standard; 11 larga; 11,5; 11,5 extra larga; 11,5 media; 11,5 stretta; 11,5 standard; 11,5 larga; 12; 12 extra larga; 12 media; 12 stretta; 12 standard; 12 larga; 12,5; 12,5 extra larga; 12,5 media; 12,5 stretta; 12,5 standard; 12,5 larga; 13; 13 extra larga; 13 media; 13 stretta; 13 standard; 13 larga; 13,5; 13,5 extra larga; 13,5 media; 13,5 stretta; 13,5 standard; 13,5 larga; 14; 14 extra larga; 14 media; 14 stretta; 14 standard; 14 larga; 14,5; 14,5 extra larga; 14,5 media; 14,5 stretta; 14,5 standard; 14,5 larga; 15; 15 extra larga; 15 media; 15 stretta; 15 standard; 15 larga; 15,5; 15,5 extra larga; 15,5 media; 15,5 stretta; 15,5 standard; 15,5 larga; 16; 16 extra larga; 16 media; 16 stretta; 16 standard; 16 larga; 16,5; 16,5 extra larga; 16,5 media; 16,5 stretta; 16,5 standard; 16,5 larga; 17; 17 extra larga; 17 media; 17 stretta; 17 standard; 17 larga; 17,5; 17,5 extra larga; 17,5 media; 17,5 stretta; 17,5 standard; 17,5 larga; 18; 18 extra larga; 18 media; 18 stretta; 18 standard; 18 larga; 2; 2 extra larga; 2 media; 2 stretta; 2 standard; 2 larga; 2,5; 2,5 extra larga; 2,5 media; 2,5 stretta; 2,5 standard; 2,5 larga; 3; 3 extra larga; 3 media; 3 stretta; 3 standard; 3 larga; 3,5; 3,5 extra larga; 3,5 media; 3,5 stretta; 3,5 standard; 3,5 larga; 4; 4 extra larga; 4 media; 4 stretta; 4 standard; 4 larga; 4,5; 4,5 extra larga; 4,5 media; 4,5 stretta; 4,5 standard; 4,5 larga; 5; 5 extra larga; 5 media; 5 stretta; 5 standard; 5 larga; 5,5; 5,5 extra larga; 5,5 media; 5,5 stretta; 5,5 standard; 5,5 larga; 6; 6 extra larga; 6 media; 6 stretta; 6 standard; 6 larga; 6,5; 6,5 extra larga; 6,5 media; 6,5 stretta; 6,5 standard; 6,5 larga; 7; 7 extra larga; 7 media; 7 stretta; 7 standard; 7 larga; 7,5; 7,5 extra larga; 7,5 media; 7,5 stretta; 7,5 standard; 7,5 larga; 8; 8 extra larga; 8 media; 8 stretta; 8 standard; 8 larga; 8,5; 8,5 extra larga; 8,5 media; 8,5 stretta; 8,5 standard; 8,5 larga; 9; 9 extra larga; 9 media; 9 stretta; 9 standard; 9 larga; 9,5; 9,5 extra larga; 9,5 media; 9,5 stretta; 9,5 standard; 9,5 larga; Altro
el: Αμερικανικό μέγεθος ανδρικών παπουτσιών: 1; 1 Πολύ φαρδύ; 1 Μεσαίο; 1 Στενό; 1 Κανονικό; 1 Φαρδύ; 1,5; 1,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 1,5 Μεσαίο; 1,5 Στενό; 1,5 Κανονικό; 1,5 Φαρδύ; 10; 10 Πολύ φαρδύ; 10 Μεσαίο; 10 Στενό; 10 Κανονικό; 10 Φαρδύ; 10,5; 10,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 10,5 Μεσαίο; 10,5 Στενό; 10,5 Κανονικό; 10,5 Φαρδύ; 11; 11 Πολύ φαρδύ; 11 Μεσαίο; 11 Στενό; 11 Κανονικό; 11 Φαρδύ; 11,5; 11,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 11,5 Μεσαίο; 11,5 Στενό; 11,5 Κανονικό; 11,5 Φαρδύ; 12; 12 Πολύ φαρδύ; 12 Μεσαίο; 12 Στενό; 12 Κανονικό; 12 Φαρδύ; 12,5; 12,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 12,5 Μεσαίο; 12,5 Στενό; 12,5 Κανονικό; 12,5 Φαρδύ; 13; 13 Πολύ φαρδύ; 13 Μεσαίο; 13 Στενό; 13 Κανονικό; 13 Φαρδύ; 13,5; 13,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 13,5 Μεσαίο; 13,5 Στενό; 13,5 Κανονικό; 13,5 Φαρδύ; 14; 14 Πολύ φαρδύ; 14 Μεσαίο; 14 Στενό; 14 Κανονικό; 14 Φαρδύ; 14,5; 14,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 14,5 Μεσαίο; 14,5 Στενό; 14,5 Κανονικό; 14,5 Φαρδύ; 15; 15 Πολύ φαρδύ; 15 Μεσαίο; 15 Στενό; 15 Κανονικό; 15 Φαρδύ; 15,5; 15,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 15,5 Μεσαίο; 15,5 Στενό; 15,5 Κανονικό; 15,5 Φαρδύ; 16; 16 Πολύ φαρδύ; 16 Μεσαίο; 16 Στενό; 16 Κανονικό; 16 Φαρδύ; 16,5; 16,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 16,5 Μεσαίο; 16,5 Στενό; 16,5 Κανονικό; 16,5 Φαρδύ; 17; 17 Πολύ φαρδύ; 17 Μεσαίο; 17 Στενό; 17 Κανονικό; 17 Φαρδύ; 17,5; 17,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 17,5 Μεσαίο; 17,5 Στενό; 17,5 Κανονικό; 17,5 Φαρδύ; 18; 18 Πολύ φαρδύ; 18 Μεσαίο; 18 Στενό; 18 Κανονικό; 18 Φαρδύ; 2; 2 Πολύ φαρδύ; 2 Μεσαίο; 2 Στενό; 2 Κανονικό; 2 Φαρδύ; 2,5; 2,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 2,5 Μεσαίο; 2,5 Στενό; 2,5 Κανονικό; 2,5 Φαρδύ; 3; 3 Πολύ φαρδύ; 3 Μεσαίο; 3 Στενό; 3 Κανονικό; 3 Φαρδύ; 3,5; 3,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 3,5 Μεσαίο; 3,5 Στενό; 3,5 Κανονικό; 3,5 Φαρδύ; 4; 4 Πολύ φαρδύ; 4 Μεσαίο; 4 Στενό; 4 Κανονικό; 4 Φαρδύ; 4,5; 4,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 4,5 Μεσαίο; 4,5 Στενό; 4,5 Κανονικό; 4,5 Φαρδύ; 5; 5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 5 Μεσαίο; 5 Στενό; 5 Κανονικό; 5 Φαρδύ; 5,5; 5,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 5,5 Μεσαίο; 5,5 Στενό; 5,5 Κανονικό; 5,5 Φαρδύ; 6; 6 Πολύ φαρδύ; 6 Μεσαίο; 6 Στενό; 6 Κανονικό; 6 Φαρδύ; 6,5; 6,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 6,5 Μεσαίο; 6,5 Στενό; 6,5 Κανονικό; 6,5 Φαρδύ; 7; 7 Πολύ φαρδύ; 7 Μεσαίο; 7 Στενό; 7 Κανονικό; 7 Φαρδύ; 7,5; 7,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 7,5 Μεσαίο; 7,5 Στενό; 7,5 Κανονικό; 7,5 Φαρδύ; 8; 8 Πολύ φαρδύ; 8 Μεσαίο; 8 Στενό; 8 Κανονικό; 8 Φαρδύ; 8,5; 8,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 8,5 Μεσαίο; 8,5 Στενό; 8,5 Κανονικό; 8,5 Φαρδύ; 9; 9 Πολύ φαρδύ; 9 Μεσαίο; 9 Στενό; 9 Κανονικό; 9 Φαρδύ; 9,5; 9,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 9,5 Μεσαίο; 9,5 Στενό; 9,5 Κανονικό; 9,5 Φαρδύ; Άλλο
sk-SK: Veľkosť pánskej obuvi v USA: 1; 1 Extra široké; 1 Stredné; 1 Úzke; 1 Štandardné; 1 Široké; 1,5; 1,5 Extra široké; 1,5 Stredné; 1,5 Úzke; 1,5 Štandardné; 1,5 Široké; 10; 10 Extra široké; 10 Stredné; 10 Úzke; 10 Štandardné; 10 Široké; 10,5; 10,5 Extra široké; 10,5 Stredné; 10,5 Úzke; 10,5 Štandardné; 10,5 Široké; 11; 11 Extra široké; 11 Stredné; 11 Úzke; 11 Štandardné; 11 Široké; 11,5; 11,5 Extra široké; 11,5 Stredné; 11,5 Úzke; 11,5 Štandardné; 11,5 Široké; 12; 12 Extra široké; 12 Stredné; 12 Úzke; 12 Štandardné; 12 Široké; 12,5; 12,5 Extra široké; 12,5 Stredné; 12,5 Úzke; 12,5 Štandardné; 12,5 Široké; 13; 13 Extra široké; 13 Stredné; 13 Úzke; 13 Štandardné; 13 Široké; 13,5; 13,5 Extra široké; 13,5 Stredné; 13,5 Úzke; 13,5 Štandardné; 13,5 Široké; 14; 14 Extra široké; 14 Stredné; 14 Úzke; 14 Štandardné; 14 Široké; 14,5; 14,5 Extra široké; 14,5 Stredné; 14,5 Úzke; 14,5 Štandardné; 14,5 Široké; 15; 15 Extra široké; 15 Stredné; 15 Úzke; 15 Štandardné; 15 Široké; 15,5; 15,5 Extra široké; 15,5 Stredné; 15,5 Úzke; 15,5 Štandardné; 15,5 Široké; 16; 16 Extra široké; 16 Stredné; 16 Úzke; 16 Štandardné; 16 Široké; 16,5; 16,5 Extra široké; 16,5 Stredné; 16,5 Úzke; 16,5 Štandardné; 16,5 Široké; 17; 17 Extra široké; 17 Stredné; 17 Úzke; 17 Štandardné; 17 Široké; 17,5; 17,5 Extra široké; 17,5 Stredné; 17,5 Úzke; 17,5 Štandardné; 17,5 Široké; 18; 18 Extra široké; 18 Stredné; 18 Úzke; 18 Štandardné; 18 Široké; 2; 2 Extra široké; 2 Stredné; 2 Úzke; 2 Štandardné; 2 Široké; 2,5; 2,5 Extra široké; 2,5 Stredné; 2,5 Úzke; 2,5 Štandardné; 2,5 Široké; 3; 3 Extra široké; 3 Stredné; 3 Úzke; 3 Štandardné; 3 Široké; 3,5; 3,5 Extra široké; 3,5 Stredné; 3,5 Úzke; 3,5 Štandardné; 3,5 Široké; 4; 4 Extra široké; 4 Stredné; 4 Úzke; 4 Štandardné; 4 Široké; 4,5; 4,5 Extra široké; 4,5 Stredné; 4,5 Úzke; 4,5 Štandardné; 4,5 Široké; 5; 5 Extra široké; 5 Stredné; 5 Úzke; 5 Štandardné; 5 Široké; 5,5; 5,5 Extra široké; 5,5 Stredné; 5,5 Úzke; 5,5 Štandardné; 5,5 Široké; 6; 6 Extra široké; 6 Stredné; 6 Úzke; 6 Štandardné; 6 Široké; 6,5; 6,5 Extra široké; 6,5 Stredné; 6,5 Úzke; 6,5 Štandardné; 6,5 Široké; 7; 7 Extra široké; 7 Stredné; 7 Úzke; 7 Štandardné; 7 Široké; 7,5; 7,5 Extra široké; 7,5 Stredné; 7,5 Úzke; 7,5 Štandardné; 7,5 Široké; 8; 8 Extra široké; 8 Stredné; 8 Úzke; 8 Štandardné; 8 Široké; 8,5; 8,5 Extra široké; 8,5 Stredné; 8,5 Úzke; 8,5 Štandardné; 8,5 Široké; 9; 9 Extra široké; 9 Stredné; 9 Úzke; 9 Štandardné; 9 Široké; 9,5; 9,5 Extra široké; 9,5 Stredné; 9,5 Úzke; 9,5 Štandardné; 9,5 Široké; Iné
pl: Rozmiar buta męskiego US: 1; 1 bardzo szeroki; 1 średni; 1 wąski; 1 standardowy; 1 szeroki; 1,5; 1,5 bardzo szeroki; 1,5 średni; 1,5 wąski; 1,5 standardowy; 1,5 szeroki; 10; 10 bardzo szeroki; 10 średni; 10 wąski; 10 standardowy; 10 szeroki; 10,5; 10,5 bardzo szeroki; 10,5 średni; 10,5 wąski; 10,5 standardowy; 10,5 szeroki; 11; 11 bardzo szeroki; 11 średni; 11 wąski; 11 standardowy; 11 szeroki; 11,5; 11,5 bardzo szeroki; 11,5 średni; 11,5 wąski; 11,5 standardowy; 11,5 szeroki; 12; 12 bardzo szeroki; 12 średni; 12 wąski; 12 standardowy; 12 szeroki; 12,5; 12,5 bardzo szeroki; 12,5 średni; 12,5 wąski; 12,5 standardowy; 12,5 szeroki; 13; 13 bardzo szeroki; 13 średni; 13 wąski; 13 standardowy; 13 szeroki; 13,5; 13,5 bardzo szeroki; 13,5 średni; 13,5 wąski; 13,5 standardowy; 13,5 szeroki; 14; 14 bardzo szeroki; 14 średni; 14 wąski; 14 standardowy; 14 szeroki; 14,5; 14,5 bardzo szeroki; 14,5 średni; 14,5 wąski; 14,5 standardowy; 14,5 szeroki; 15; 15 bardzo szeroki; 15 średni; 15 wąski; 15 standardowy; 15 szeroki; 15,5; 15,5 bardzo szeroki; 15,5 średni; 15,5 wąski; 15,5 standardowy; 15,5 szeroki; 16; 16 bardzo szeroki; 16 średni; 16 wąski; 16 standardowy; 16 szeroki; 16,5; 16,5 bardzo szeroki; 16,5 średni; 16,5 wąski; 16,5 standardowy; 16,5 szeroki; 17; 17 bardzo szeroki; 17 średni; 17 wąski; 17 standardowy; 17 szeroki; 17,5; 17,5 bardzo szeroki; 17,5 średni; 17,5 wąski; 17,5 standardowy; 17,5 szeroki; 18; 18 bardzo szeroki; 18 średni; 18 wąski; 18 standardowy; 18 szeroki; 2; 2 bardzo szeroki; 2 średni; 2 wąski; 2 standardowy; 2 szeroki; 2,5; 2,5 bardzo szeroki; 2,5 średni; 2,5 wąski; 2,5 standardowy; 2,5 szeroki; 3; 3 bardzo szeroki; 3 średni; 3 wąski; 3 standardowy; 3 szeroki; 3,5; 3,5 bardzo szeroki; 3,5 średni; 3,5 wąski; 3,5 standardowy; 3,5 szeroki; 4; 4 bardzo szeroki; 4 średni; 4 wąski; 4 standardowy; 4 szeroki; 4,5; 4,5 bardzo szeroki; 4,5 średni; 4,5 wąski; 4,5 standardowy; 4,5 szeroki; 5; 5 bardzo szeroki; 5 średni; 5 wąski; 5 standardowy; 5 szeroki; 5,5; 5,5 bardzo szeroki; 5,5 średni; 5,5 wąski; 5,5 standardowy; 5,5 szeroki; 6; 6 bardzo szeroki; 6 średni; 6 wąski; 6 standardowy; 6 szeroki; 6,5; 6,5 bardzo szeroki; 6,5 średni; 6,5 wąski; 6,5 standardowy; 6,5 szeroki; 7; 7 bardzo szeroki; 7 średni; 7 wąski; 7 standardowy; 7 szeroki; 7,5; 7,5 bardzo szeroki; 7,5 średni; 7,5 wąski; 7,5 standardowy; 7,5 szeroki; 8; 8 bardzo szeroki; 8 średni; 8 wąski; 8 standardowy; 8 szeroki; 8,5; 8,5 bardzo szeroki; 8,5 średni; 8,5 wąski; 8,5 standardowy; 8,5 szeroki; 9; 9 bardzo szeroki; 9 średni; 9 wąski; 9 standardowy; 9 szeroki; 9,5; 9,5 bardzo szeroki; 9,5 średni; 9,5 wąski; 9,5 standardowy; 9,5 szeroki; Inny
vi: Cỡ giày nam US: 1; 1 Rất rộng; 1 Trung bình; 1 Hẹp; 1 Tiêu chuẩn; 1 Rộng; 1,5; 1,5 Rất rộng; 1,5 Trung bình; 1,5 Hẹp; 1,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 1,5 Rộng; 10; 10 Rất rộng; 10 Trung bình; 10 Hẹp; 10 Tiêu chuẩn; 10 Rộng; 10,5; 10,5 Rất rộng; 10,5 Trung bình; 10,5 Hẹp; 10,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 10,5 Rộng; 11; 11 Rất rộng; 11 Trung bình; 11 Hẹp; 11 Tiêu chuẩn; 11 Rộng; 11,5; 11,5 Rất rộng; 11,5 Trung bình; 11,5 Hẹp; 11,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 11,5 Rộng; 12; 12 Rất rộng; 12 Trung bình; 12 Hẹp; 12 Tiêu chuẩn; 12 Rộng; 12,5; 12,5 Rất rộng; 12,5 Trung bình; 12,5 Hẹp; 12,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 12,5 Rộng; 13; 13 Rất rộng; 13 Trung bình; 13 Hẹp; 13 Tiêu chuẩn; 13 Rộng; 13,5; 13,5 Rất rộng; 13,5 Trung bình; 13,5 Hẹp; 13,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 13,5 Rộng; 14; 14 Rất rộng; 14 Trung bình; 14 Hẹp; 14 Tiêu chuẩn; 14 Rộng; 14,5; 14,5 Rất rộng; 14,5 Trung bình; 14,5 Hẹp; 14,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 14,5 Rộng; 15; 15 Rất rộng; 15 Trung bình; 15 Hẹp; 15 Tiêu chuẩn; 15 Rộng; 15,5; 15,5 Rất rộng; 15,5 Trung bình; 15,5 Hẹp; 15,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 15,5 Rộng; 16; 16 Rất rộng; 16 Trung bình; 16 Hẹp; 16 Tiêu chuẩn; 16 Rộng; 16,5; 16,5 Rất rộng; 16,5 Trung bình; 16,5 Hẹp; 16,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 16,5 Rộng; 17; 17 Rất rộng; 17 Trung bình; 17 Hẹp; 17 Tiêu chuẩn; 17 Rộng; 17,5; 17,5 Rất rộng; 17,5 Trung bình; 17,5 Hẹp; 17,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 17,5 Rộng; 18; 18 Rất rộng; 18 Trung bình; 18 Hẹp; 18 Tiêu chuẩn; 18 Rộng; 2; 2 Rất rộng; 2 Trung bình; 2 Hẹp; 2 Tiêu chuẩn; 2 Rộng; 2,5; 2,5 Rất rộng; 2,5 Trung bình; 2,5 Hẹp; 2,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 2,5 Rộng; 3; 3 Rất rộng; 3 Trung bình; 3 Hẹp; 3 Tiêu chuẩn; 3 Rộng; 3,5; 3,5 Rất rộng; 3,5 Trung bình; 3,5 Hẹp; 3,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 3,5 Rộng; 4; 4 Rất rộng; 4 Trung bình; 4 Hẹp; 4 Tiêu chuẩn; 4 Rộng; 4,5; 4,5 Rất rộng; 4,5 Trung bình; 4,5 Hẹp; 4,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 4,5 Rộng; 5; 5 Rất rộng; 5 Trung bình; 5 Hẹp; 5 Tiêu chuẩn; 5 Rộng; 5,5; 5,5 Rất rộng; 5,5 Trung bình; 5,5 Hẹp; 5,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 5,5 Rộng; 6; 6 Rất rộng; 6 Trung bình; 6 Hẹp; 6 Tiêu chuẩn; 6 Rộng; 6,5; 6,5 Rất rộng; 6,5 Trung bình; 6,5 Hẹp; 6,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 6,5 Rộng; 7; 7 Rất rộng; 7 Trung bình; 7 Hẹp; 7 Tiêu chuẩn; 7 Rộng; 7,5; 7,5 Rất rộng; 7,5 Trung bình; 7,5 Hẹp; 7,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 7,5 Rộng; 8; 8 Rất rộng; 8 Trung bình; 8 Hẹp; 8 Tiêu chuẩn; 8 Rộng; 8,5; 8,5 Rất rộng; 8,5 Trung bình; 8,5 Hẹp; 8,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 8,5 Rộng; 9; 9 Rất rộng; 9 Trung bình; 9 Hẹp; 9 Tiêu chuẩn; 9 Rộng; 9,5; 9,5 Rất rộng; 9,5 Trung bình; 9,5 Hẹp; 9,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 9,5 Rộng; Khác
pt-PT: Tamanho de calçado masculino dos EUA: 1; 1 extra largo; 1 médio; 1 estreito; 1 padrão; 1 largo; 1,5; 1,5 extra largo; 1,5 médio; 1,5 estreito; 1,5 padrão; 1,5 largo; 10; 10 extra largo; 10 médio; 10 estreito; 10 padrão; 10 largo; 10,5; 10,5 extra largo; 10,5 médio; 10,5 estreito; 10,5 padrão; 10,5 largo; 11; 11 extra largo; 11 médio; 11 estreito; 11 padrão; 11 largo; 11,5; 11,5 extra largo; 11,5 médio; 11,5 estreito; 11,5 padrão; 11,5 largo; 12; 12 extra largo; 12 médio; 12 estreito; 12 padrão; 12 largo; 12,5; 12,5 extra largo; 12,5 médio; 12,5 estreito; 12,5 padrão; 12,5 largo; 13; 13 extra largo; 13 médio; 13 estreito; 13 padrão; 13 largo; 13,5; 13,5 extra largo; 13,5 médio; 13,5 estreito; 13,5 padrão; 13,5 largo; 14; 14 extra largo; 14 médio; 14 estreito; 14 padrão; 14 largo; 14,5; 14,5 extra largo; 14,5 médio; 14,5 estreito; 14,5 padrão; 14,5 largo; 15; 15 extra largo; 15 médio; 15 estreito; 15 padrão; 15 largo; 15,5; 15,5 extra largo; 15,5 médio; 15,5 estreito; 15,5 padrão; 15,5 largo; 16; 16 extra largo; 16 médio; 16 estreito; 16 padrão; 16 largo; 16,5; 16,5 extra largo; 16,5 médio; 16,5 estreito; 16,5 padrão; 16,5 largo; 17; 17 extra largo; 17 médio; 17 estreito; 17 padrão; 17 largo; 17,5; 17,5 extra largo; 17,5 médio; 17,5 estreito; 17,5 padrão; 17,5 largo; 18; 18 extra largo; 18 médio; 18 estreito; 18 padrão; 18 largo; 2; 2 extra largo; 2 médio; 2 estreito; 2 padrão; 2 largo; 2,5; 2,5 extra largo; 2,5 médio; 2,5 estreito; 2,5 padrão; 2,5 largo; 3; 3 extra largo; 3 médio; 3 estreito; 3 padrão; 3 largo; 3,5; 3,5 extra largo; 3,5 médio; 3,5 estreito; 3,5 padrão; 3,5 largo; 4; 4 extra largo; 4 médio; 4 estreito; 4 padrão; 4 largo; 4,5; 4,5 extra largo; 4,5 médio; 4,5 estreito; 4,5 padrão; 4,5 largo; 5; 5 extra largo; 5 médio; 5 estreito; 5 padrão; 5 largo; 5,5; 5,5 extra largo; 5,5 médio; 5,5 estreito; 5,5 padrão; 5,5 largo; 6; 6 extra largo; 6 médio; 6 estreito; 6 padrão; 6 largo; 6,5; 6,5 extra largo; 6,5 médio; 6,5 estreito; 6,5 padrão; 6,5 largo; 7; 7 extra largo; 7 médio; 7 estreito; 7 padrão; 7 largo; 7,5; 7,5 extra largo; 7,5 médio; 7,5 estreito; 7,5 padrão; 7,5 largo; 8; 8 extra largo; 8 médio; 8 estreito; 8 padrão; 8 largo; 8,5; 8,5 extra largo; 8,5 médio; 8,5 estreito; 8,5 padrão; 8,5 largo; 9; 9 extra largo; 9 médio; 9 estreito; 9 padrão; 9 largo; 9,5; 9,5 extra largo; 9,5 médio; 9,5 estreito; 9,5 padrão; 9,5 largo; Outro